Florida, session 2026, SB1580.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 355 356 Section 1.âSection 849.23, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 357 Section 2.âSubsection (5) of section 16.71, Florida 358 Statutes, is amended to read: 359 16.71âFlorida Gaming Control Commission; creation; 360 meetings; membership.â 361 (5)âINSPECTOR GENERAL.âThe chair of the commission shall 362 appoint an inspector general who shall perform the duties of an 363 inspector general under s. 20.055. Except for the appointment of 364 an inspector general under s. 20.055(3)(a)1., the commission may 365 delegate any of the duties and powers of an agency head under s. 366 20.055 to a commissioner serving on the commission. 367 Section 3.âParagraph (h) of subsection (3) of section 368 16.712, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraphs (i) and (j) 369 are added to that subsection, to read: 370 16.712âFlorida Gaming Control Commission authorizations, 371 duties, and responsibilities.â 372 (3)âBy December 1 of each year, the commission shall make 373 an annual report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, 374 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The report 375 must, at a minimum, include all of the following: 376 (h)âA summary of actions taken and investigations conducted 377 by the commission, including the number of investigations that 378 led to criminal charges being filed and the resolution of such 379 criminal cases. 380 (i)âThe number of complaints received by the commission, 381 categorized by subject matter or type of complaint, and a 382 summary of the action taken by the commission on each complaint. 383 (j)âA list of property seized by the commission during the 384 course of its investigations, and the disposition of such 385 property, including a list of forfeiture actions. 386 Section 4.âParagraph (d) is added to subsection (2) of 387 section 16.713, Florida Statutes, to read: 388 16.713âFlorida Gaming Control Commission; appointment and 389 employment restrictions.â 390 (2)âPROHIBITIONS FOR EMPLOYEES AND COMMISSIONERS; PERSONS 391 INELIGIBLE FOR APPOINTMENT TO AND EMPLOYMENT WITH THE 392 COMMISSION.â 393 (d)1.âA person who is ineligible for employment with the 394 commission under this subsection may submit a waiver request to 395 the commission to be considered eligible for employment as a 396 career service or other-personal-services employee if such 397 person possesses industry expertise in pari-mutuel wagering, 398 cardrooms, or slot machine operations. 399 2.âThe commission shall consider waiver requests on a case 400 by-case basis and shall approve or deny each request. If the 401 commission approves the waiver request, the person is eligible 402 for employment with the commission. This paragraph does not 403 apply to persons seeking appointment to the commission. The 404 standard of review applicable to the commission under this 405 subsection is whether the commissionâs action was an abuse of 406 discretion. The commission may adopt rules to implement the 407 provisions of this subsection. 408 409 For the purposes of this subsection, the term ârelativeâ means a 410 spouse, father, mother, son, daughter, grandfather, grandmother, 411 brother, sister, uncle, aunt, cousin, nephew, niece, father-in 412 law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, brother-in-law, 413 sister-in-law, stepfather, stepmother, stepson, stepdaughter, 414 stepbrother, stepsister, half brother, or half sister. 415 Section 5.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) and paragraph 416 (c) of subsection (2) of section 16.715, Florida Statutes, are 417 amended to read: 418 16.715âFlorida Gaming Control Commission standards of 419 conduct; ex parte communications.â 420 (1)âSTANDARDS OF CONDUCT.â 421 (b)1.âA commissioner or employee of the commission may not 422 accept anything from any business entity that, either directly 423 or indirectly, owns or controls any person regulated by the 424 commission or from any business entity that, either directly or 425 indirectly, is an affiliate or subsidiary of any person 426 regulated by the commission. 427 2.âA commissioner or an employee may attend conferences, 428 along with associated meals and events that are generally 429 available to all conference participants, without payment of any 430 fees in addition to the conference fee. Additionally, while 431 attending a conference, a commissioner or an employee may attend 432 meetings, meals, or events that are not sponsored, in whole or 433 in part, by any representative of any person regulated by the 434 commission and that are limited to commissioners or employees 435 only, committee members, or speakers if the commissioner or 436 employee is a member of a committee of the association of 437 regulatory agencies which organized the conference or is a 438 speaker at the conference. It is not a violation of this 439 subparagraph for a commissioner or an employee to attend a 440 conference for which conference participants who are employed by 441 a person regulated by the commission have paid a higher 442 conference registration fee than the commissioner or employee, 443 or to attend a meal or event that is generally available to all 444 conference participants without payment of any fees in addition 445 to the conference fee and that is sponsored, in whole or in 446 part, by a person regulated by the commission. 447 3.âWhile employed, and for 2 years after service as a 448 commissioner or for 2 years after employment with the 449 commission, a commissioner or an employee may not accept any 450 form of employment with or engage in any business activity with 451 any business entity that, either directly or indirectly, owns or 452 controls any person regulated by the commission; any person 453 regulated by the commission; or any business entity that, either 454 directly or indirectly, is an affiliate or subsidiary of any 455 person regulated by the commission. 456 4.âWhile employed, and for 2 years after service as a 457 commissioner or for 2 years after employment with the 458 commission, a commissioner, an employee, or a relative living in 459 the same household as a commissioner or an employee may not have 460 any financial interest, other than shares in a mutual fund, in 461 any person regulated by the commission; in any business entity 462 that, either directly or indirectly, owns or controls any person 463 regulated by the commission; or in any business entity that, 464 either directly or indirectly, is an affiliate or a subsidiary 465 of any person regulated by the commission. If a commissioner, an 466 employee, or a relative living in the same household as a 467 commissioner or an employee acquires any financial interest 468 prohibited by this subsection during the commissionerâs term of 469 office or the employeeâs employment with the commission as a 470 result of events or actions beyond the commissionerâs, the 471 employeeâs, or the relativeâs control, he or she must shall 472 immediately sell such financial interest. For the purposes of 473 this subsection, the term ârelativeâ has the same meaning as in 474 s. 16.713(2)(b). 475 5.âA commissioner or an employee may not accept anything 476 from a party in a proceeding currently pending before the 477 commission. 478 6.âA commissioner may not serve as the representative of 479 any political party or on any executive committee or other 480 governing body of a political party; serve as an executive 481 officer or employee of any political party, committee, 482 organization, or association; receive remuneration for 483 activities on behalf of any candidate for public office; engage 484 on behalf of any candidate for public office in the solicitation 485 of votes or other activities on behalf of such candidacy; or 486 become a candidate for election to any public office without 487 first resigning from office. 488 7.âA commissioner, during his or her term of office, may 489 not make any public comment regarding the merits of any 490 proceeding under ss. 120.569 and 120.57 currently pending before 491 the commission. 492 8.âA commissioner or an employee may not act in an 493 unprofessional manner at any time during the performance of 494 official duties. 495 9.âA commissioner or an employee shall must avoid 496 impropriety in all activities and shall must act at all times in 497 a manner that promotes public confidence in the integrity and 498 impartiality of the commission. 499 10.âA commissioner or an employee may not directly or 500 indirectly, through staff or other means, solicit anything of 501 value from any person regulated by the commission, or from any 502 business entity that, whether directly or indirectly, is an 503 affiliate or a subsidiary of any person regulated by the 504 commission, or from any party appearing in a proceeding 505 considered by the commission in the last 2 years. 506 11.âA commissioner may not lobby the Governor or any agency 507 of the state, members or employees of the Legislature, or any 508 county or municipal government or governmental agency except to 509 represent the commission in an official capacity. 510 (2)âFORMER COMMISSIONERS AND EMPLOYEES.â 511 (c)âA person employed by the commission and classified as 512 Senior Management Service, Selected Exempt Service, or career 513 service may not, for the 2 years immediately following the date 514 of termination or resignation from employment with the 515 commission: 516 1.âHold a permit or license issued under chapter 550, or a 517 license issued under chapter 551 or chapter 849; be an officer, 518 official, or employee of such permitholder or licensee; or be an 519 ultimate equitable owner, as defined in s. 550.002(37), of such 520 permitholder or licensee; or 521 2.âAccept employment or compensation from, or engage in any 522 business activity with, a business entity that, directly or 523 indirectly, owns or controls a person regulated by the 524 commission; any person regulated by the commission; any business 525 entity that, directly or indirectly, is an affiliate or 526 subsidiary of a person regulated by the commission; or any 527 business entity or trade association that has been a party to a 528 commission proceeding within the 2 years preceding the 529 employeeâs resignation or termination of employment from the 530 commission; or 531 3.âBe a bingo game operator or an employee of a bingo game 532 operator. 533 534 Notwithstanding any other law, an employee classified as career 535 service may request that the commission waive the postemployment 536 restrictions of subparagraph 1., but only for the purpose of 537 obtaining an occupational license under s. 550.105, s. 551.107, 538 or s. 849.086(6); or for any other postemployment restrictions 539 under subparagraph 2. or subparagraph 3. If the commission 540 approves the request, the employee is exempt from paragraph (d). 541 The commission shall consider and approve or deny waiver 542 requests on a case-by-case basis. The commission may adopt rules 543 to implement this paragraph. 544 Section 6.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 545 20.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 546 20.055âAgency inspectors general.â 547 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 548 (a)ââAgency headâ means the Governor, a Cabinet officer, or 549 a secretary or executive director as those terms are defined in 550 s. 20.03, the chair of the Public Service Commission, the 551 Director of the Office of Insurance Regulation of the Financial 552 Services Commission, the Director of the Office of Financial 553 Regulation of the Financial Services Commission, the board of 554 directors of the Florida Housing Finance Corporation, the 555 commissioners chair of the Florida Gaming Control Commission, 556 and the Chief Justice of the State Supreme Court. 557 Section 7.âSubsection (10) of section 546.10, Florida 558 Statutes, is added to read: 559 546.10âAmusement games or machines.â 560 (10)(a)1.âBefore purchasing or installing a game or machine 561 on the premises of any veteransâ service organization granted a 562 federal charter under Title 36, U.S.C., or a division, a 563 department, a post, or a chapter of such organization, for which 564 an alcoholic beverage license has been issued, the organization 565 may petition the Florida Gaming Control Commission for a 566 declaratory statement under s. 120.565 on whether the operation 567 of such game or machine is authorized under this section or is a 568 violation of this section or chapter 849. A game or machine 569 awaiting such declaratory statement from the commission may not 570 be purchased or installed until the declaratory statement is 571 issued. 572 2.âA veteransâ service organization as described in 573 subparagraph 1. which has a game or machine already installed on 574 its premises may petition the commission for a declaratory 575 statement under s. 120.565 on whether the operation of such game 576 or machine is authorized under this section or is a violation of 577 this section or chapter 849. If the game, machine, premises, or 578 organization is the subject of an ongoing criminal 579 investigation, the organization may not petition the commission 580 for a declaratory statement under this subsection. 581 3.âThe commission must issue a declaratory statement or 582 deny the petition within 60 days after completing its 583 investigation of the game or machine subject to the statement or 584 90 days after receiving a complete petition requesting such 585 statement, whichever is earlier. The commission may not deny a 586 petition that is validly requested pursuant to this subsection 587 and s. 120.565. 588 (b)âA petition for a declaratory statement made pursuant to 589 paragraph (a) is deemed complete if it provides the information 590 required for the commission to issue the declaratory statement 591 and is accompanied by the specifications, including all 592 pertinent information and documentation and access to hardware 593 and associated software by the commissionâs contracted testing 594 lab, for the type of game or machine that the organization will 595 purchase or install or already installed on the premises. The 596 declaratory statement issued under this subsection is valid only 597 for the game or machine for which it is requested and is invalid 598 if the specifications for the game or the machine have been 599 changed. 600 (c)âA declaratory statement issued under this subsection is 601 binding on the commission and may be introduced in any 602 subsequent proceedings relating to the game or machine for which 603 the declaratory statement is requested as evidence of a good 604 faith effort to comply with this section or chapter 849. 605 (d)âThis subsection does not prevent the commission or any 606 other criminal justice agency as defined in s. 943.045 from 607 detecting, apprehending, and arresting a person for any alleged 608 violation of this chapter, chapter 24, part II of chapter 285, 609 chapter 550, chapter 551, or chapter 849, or any rule adopted 610 pursuant thereto, or of any law of this state. 611 (e)âThis subsection does not require an owner or an 612 operator of an amusement game or machine under this section to 613 request or obtain a declaratory statement in order to operate 614 pursuant to this section. 615 Section 8.âParagraph (b) of subsection (6) of section 616 551.107, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 617 551.107âSlot machine occupational license; findings; 618 application; fee.â 619 (6) 620 (b)âThe commission may deny, revoke, or refuse to renew any 621 slot machine occupational license if the applicant for such 622 license or the licensee has been convicted of a felony or 623 misdemeanor in this state, in any other state, or under the laws 624 of the United States if such felony or misdemeanor is related to 625 gambling or bookmaking as described in s. 849.25. The 626 restrictions excluding offenders under this section authorized 627 in this paragraph may be waived by the commission if the 628 applicant establishes that she or he is of good moral character, 629 that she or he has been rehabilitated, and that the crime she or 630 he was convicted of is not related to slot machine gaming and is 631 not a capital offense. The commission shall consider and approve 632 or deny waiver requests on a case-by-case basis. The standard of 633 review applicable to the commission under this paragraph is 634 whether the commissionâs action was an abuse of discretion. 635 Section 9.âSubsection (3) of section 782.04, Florida 636 Statutes, is amended to read: 637 782.04âMurder.â 638 (3)âWhen a human being is killed during the perpetration 639 of, or during the attempt to perpetrate, any: 640 (a)âTrafficking offense prohibited by s. 893.135(1), 641 (b)âArson, 642 (c)âSexual battery, 643 (d)âRobbery, 644 (e)âBurglary, 645 (f)âKidnapping, 646 (g)âEscape, 647 (h)âAggravated child abuse, 648 (i)âAggravated abuse of an elderly person or disabled 649 adult, 650 (j)âAircraft piracy, 651 (k)âUnlawful throwing, placing, or discharging of a 652 destructive device or bomb, 653 (l)âCarjacking, 654 (m)âHome-invasion robbery, 655 (n)âAggravated stalking, 656 (o)âMurder of another human being, 657 (p)âAggravated fleeing or eluding with serious bodily 658 injury or death, 659 (q)âResisting an officer with violence to his or her 660 person, or 661 (r)âFelony that is an act of terrorism or is in furtherance 662 of an act of terrorism, including a felony under s. 775.30, s. 663 775.32, s. 775.33, s. 775.34, or s. 775.35, or 664 (s)âKeeping a gambling house under s. 849.01, 665 666 by a person other than the person engaged in the perpetration of 667 or in the attempt to perpetrate such felony, the person 668 perpetrating or attempting to perpetrate such felony commits 669 murder in the second degree, which constitutes a felony of the 670 first degree, punishable by imprisonment for a term of years not 671 exceeding life or as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 672 775.084. 673 Section 10.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 838.12, 674 Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection (3) is added to 675 that section, to read: 676 838.12âBribery in athletic contests.â 677 (1)âA person who Whoever gives, promises, offers or 678 conspires to give, promise or offer, to anyone who participates 679 or expects to participate in any professional or amateur game, 680 contest, match, race or sport; or to any umpire, referee, judge 681 or other official of such game, contest, match, race or sport; 682 or to any owner, manager, coach or trainer of, or to any 683 relative of, or to any person having any direct, indirect, 684 remote or possible connection with, any team, individual, 685 participant or prospective participant in any such professional 686 or amateur game, contest, match, race or sport, or the officials 687 aforesaid, any bribe, money, goods, present, reward or any 688 valuable thing whatsoever, or any promise, contract or agreement 689 whatsoever, with intent to influence him or her or them to lose 690 or cause to be lost any game, contest, match, race or sport, or 691 to limit his or her or their or any personâs or any teamâs 692 margin of victory in any game, contest, match, race, or sport, 693 or to fix or throw any game, contest, match, race or sport, 694 commits shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree, 695 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 696 (2)âAny participant or prospective participant in any 697 professional or amateur game, contest, match, race or sport; or 698 any umpire, referee, judge or other official of such game, 699 contest, match, race or sport; or any owner, manager, coach or 700 trainer of, or any relative of, or any person having any direct, 701 indirect, remote or possible connection with, any team, 702 individual, participant or prospective participant in any such 703 professional or amateur game, contest, match, race or sport, or 704 the officials aforesaid; who in any way solicits, receives or 705 accepts, or agrees to receive or accept, or who conspires to 706 receive or accept, any bribe, money, goods, present, reward or 707 any valuable thing whatsoever, or any promise, contract or 708 agreement whatsoever, with intent to lose or cause to be lost 709 any game, contest, match, race or sport, or to limit his, her, 710 their or any personâs or any teamâs margin of victory in any 711 game, contest, match, race or sport, or to fix or throw any 712 game, contest, match, race or sport, commits shall be guilty of 713 a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 714 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 715 (3)âA person who stakes, bets, or wagers any money or other 716 thing of value upon the result of any professional or amateur 717 game, contest, match, race, or sport with knowledge that the 718 outcome of such professional or amateur game, contest, match, 719 race, or sport is prearranged or predetermined as described in 720 subsection (1) or subsection (2) commits a felony of the third 721 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 722 775.084. 723 Section 11.âSection 843.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to 724 read: 725 843.08âFalse personation.âA person who falsely assumes or 726 pretends to be a firefighter, a sheriff, an officer of the 727 Florida Highway Patrol, an officer of the Fish and Wildlife 728 Conservation Commission, an officer of the Department of 729 Environmental Protection, an officer of the Department of 730 Financial Services, any personnel or representative of the 731 Florida Gaming Control Commission, any personnel or 732 representative of the Division of Criminal Investigations, an 733 officer of the Department of Corrections, a correctional 734 probation officer, a deputy sheriff, a state attorney or an 735 assistant state attorney, a statewide prosecutor or an assistant 736 statewide prosecutor, a state attorney investigator, a coroner, 737 a police officer, a lottery special agent or lottery 738 investigator, a beverage enforcement agent, a school guardian as 739 described in s. 30.15(1)(k), a security officer licensed under 740 chapter 493, any member of the Florida Commission on Offender 741 Review or any administrative aide or supervisor employed by the 742 commission, any personnel or representative of the Department of 743 Law Enforcement, or a federal law enforcement officer as defined 744 in s. 901.1505, and takes upon himself or herself to act as 745 such, or to require any other person to aid or assist him or her 746 in a matter pertaining to the duty of any such officer, commits 747 a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 748 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. However, a person who 749 falsely personates any such officer during the course of the 750 commission of a felony commits a felony of the second degree, 751 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 752 If the commission of the felony results in the death or personal 753 injury of another human being, the person commits a felony of 754 the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 755 775.083, or s. 775.084. In determining whether a defendant has 756 violated this section, the court or jury may consider any 757 relevant evidence, including, but not limited to, whether the 758 defendant used lights in violation of s. 316.2397 or s. 843.081. 759 Section 12.âSection 849.01, Florida Statutes, is amended to 760 read: 761 849.01âKeeping gambling houses, etc.â 762 (1)âA person who, Whoever by herself or himself, her or his 763 servant, clerk or agent, or in any other manner has, keeps, 764 exercises, or maintains a gaming table or room, or gaming 765 implements or apparatus, or house, booth, tent, shelter, or 766 other place for the purpose of gaming or gambling or in any 767 place of which she or he may directly or indirectly have charge, 768 control, or management, either exclusively or with others, 769 procures, suffers, or permits any person to play for money or 770 other valuable thing at any game whatever, whether heretofore 771 prohibited or not, commits the offense of keeping a gambling 772 house. 773 (2)(a)âFor a first offense, a person who violates 774 subsection (1) commits a felony misdemeanor of the third second 775 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, or s. 775.083, or 776 s. 775.084. 777 (b)âFor a second or subsequent offense, a person who 778 violates subsection (1) commits a felony of the second degree, 779 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 780 (3)âAs used in this subsection, the term âcourse of 781 conductâ means a pattern of conduct composed of a series of acts 782 over a period of time, however short, which evidences a 783 continuity of purpose. 784 (a)âA person may not knowingly, or in reckless disregard of 785 the fact: 786 1.âBenefit financially or receive anything of value, 787 whether or not as a legal entity, in furtherance of a violation 788 of subsection (1); or 789 2.âParticipate in a course of conduct in providing any 790 service, product, or material benefit in the furtherance of a 791 violation of subsection (1). 792 (b)âA person who violates paragraph (a) commits a felony of 793 the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 794 775.083, or s. 775.084. 795 (c)âA person found in violation of paragraph (a) shall be 796 ordered to pay a fine of $50,000 for each violation. 797 (4)âNotwithstanding subsection (2), a person who violates 798 subsection (1) commits a felony of the second degree, punishable 799 as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, if, during 800 the commission of an offense under this section, an individual 801 suffers great bodily harm, permanent disability, or permanent 802 disfigurement. 803 Section 13.âSection 849.02, Florida Statutes, is amended to 804 read: 805 849.02âAgents or employees of keeper of gambling house.â 806 (1)âA person who Whoever acts as servant, clerk, agent, or 807 employee of any person in the violation of s. 849.01 commits: 808 (a)âFor a first offense, a misdemeanor of the first degree, 809 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 810 (b)âFor a second offense, a felony of the third degree, 811 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 812 (c)âFor a third or subsequent offense, a felony of the 813 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 814 or s. 775.084 shall be punished in the manner and to the extent 815 therein mentioned. 816 (2)(a)âNotwithstanding subsection (1), if the clerk, agent, 817 or employee is authorized to bind the gambling house in 818 violation of s. 849.01 or act on behalf of any person in the 819 violation of s. 849.01, he or she commits a felony of the third 820 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 821 755.084. 822 (b)âFor a second or subsequent offense, a person commits a 823 felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 824 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 825 Section 14.âSection 849.021, Florida Statutes, is created 826 to read: 827 849.021âGovernment employee misconduct.â 828 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 829 (a)ââGovernment employeeâ means any person employed by, or 830 acting on behalf of, the state or any political subdivision 831 thereof. 832 (b)ââPolitical subdivisionâ means a county, municipality, 833 department, commission, district, board, or other public body, 834 whether corporate or otherwise, created by or under state law. 835 (2)âA government employee may not knowingly certify, 836 license, approve, aid, facilitate, or conceal the operation of a 837 gambling house in violation of s. 849.01. 838 (3)âA person who violates subsection (2) commits: 839 (a)âFor a first offense, a felony of the third degree, 840 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 841 (b)âFor a second or subsequent offense, a felony of the 842 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 843 or s. 775.084. 844 (4)âThis section does not apply to any person who is acting 845 in the scope of his or her employment and, in good faith, 846 reports suspected violations of chapter 849 to law enforcement 847 or regulatory agencies. 848 Section 15.âSection 849.023, Florida Statutes, is created 849 to read: 850 849.023âLicensure disqualifying offenses; corporate 851 shielding prohibited.â 852 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 853 (a)ââCommissionâ means the Florida Gaming Control 854 Commission. 855 (b)ââControlling personâ means: 856 1.âA corporate officer or director, or, if a limited 857 liability company, a manager, of the licensee or applicant for a 858 license; 859 2.âA general partner, member, or owner of more than 5 860 percent of any equity interest, direct or indirect, in the 861 licensee or applicant; or 862 3.âAn owner of any interest in the licensee or applicant, 863 including any immediate family member of the owner, or holder of 864 any debt, mortgage, contract, or concession from the licensee or 865 applicant, who by virtue thereof is able to control the business 866 of the licensee or applicant. 867 (c)ââConvictionâ means a determination of guilt which is 868 the result of a plea or trial, regardless of whether 869 adjudication is withheld or a plea of nolo contendere is 870 entered. 871 (d)ââLicenseâ has the same meaning as in s. 120.52 and is 872 issued by: 873 1.âThe Department of Business and Professional Regulation 874 pursuant to chapter 509, chapter 561, chapter 562, chapter 563, 875 chapter 564, chapter 565, chapter 567, chapter 568, or chapter 876 569; 877 2.âThe commission pursuant to chapter 550, chapter 551, or 878 s. 849.086; or 879 3.âThe Office of Financial Regulation pursuant to chapter 880 560. 881 (e)ââLicenseeâ means a holder of a license. 882 (f)ââOwnerâ means a sole member or owner of 100 percent of 883 any equity interest, direct or indirect, in the licensee or 884 applicant. 885 (2)âPENALTIES.â 886 (a)1.âNotwithstanding subsection (1), pursuant to s. 887 120.60(6), a violation of s. 849.01, s. 849.03, or s. 849.15 is 888 deemed an immediate and serious danger to public health, safety, 889 and welfare, and the Department of Business and Professional 890 Regulation, the commission, or the Office of Financial 891 Regulation may summarily suspend the license of any person found 892 in violation of s. 849.01, s. 849.03, or 849.15, or of any 893 business entity if its controlling person or sole owner is found 894 to be in violation of s. 849.01, s. 849.03, or s. 849.15. 895 2.âIn addition to any other penalty provided by law, a 896 licensee or an applicant may have a license revoked or any 897 application thereof denied or not reissued if the licensee or 898 applicant, the controlling person of the licensee or applicant, 899 or the sole owner of the licensee or applicant is convicted of a 900 violation of s. 849.01, s. 849.03, or s. 849.15. 901 3.âNotwithstanding subparagraph 2., a licensee or applicant 902 may retain, apply for, or be reissued a license if the license 903 issuing agency finds that such licensee has removed the 904 controlling person from the business. 905 (b)âNotwithstanding paragraph (a), a licensee is subject to 906 a fine of up to $75,000 for a violation of s. 849.01, s. 849.03, 907 or s. 849.15. 908 Section 16.âSection 849.03, Florida Statutes, is amended to 909 read: 910 849.03âRenting or leasing house for gambling purposes.â 911 (1)âA person who Whoever, whether as owner or agent, 912 knowingly rents or leases to another a house, room, booth, tent, 913 shelter, or place for the purpose of gaming commits: 914 (a)âFor a first offense, a felony of the third degree, 915 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 916 (b)âFor a second or subsequent offense, a felony of the 917 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 918 or s. 775.084 shall be punished in the manner and to the extent 919 mentioned in s. 849.01. 920 (2)âFor purposes of this section, the term âknowinglyâ 921 means having general or reasonable knowledge of, or reasonable 922 belief or grounds for belief that, a violation of s. 849.01 is 923 occurring. 924 Section 17.âSection 849.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to 925 read: 926 849.08âGambling.â 927 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 928 (a)ââInternet gamblingâ means to play or engage in a game 929 in which money or other thing of value is awarded based on 930 chance, regardless of any application of skill, which game is 931 available on the Internet and accessible on a mobile device, 932 computer terminal, or other similar access device and simulates 933 casino-style gaming, including, but not limited to, slot 934 machines, video poker, and table games. 935 (b)ââInternet sports wageringâ means to stake, bet, or 936 wager money or other thing of value upon the result of any trial 937 or contest of skill, speed, power, or endurance of human or 938 beast, other than pari-mutuel wagering conducted pursuant to 939 chapter 550, which is available on the Internet and accessible 940 on a mobile device, computer terminal, or other similar access 941 device. 942 (2)âA person who Whoever plays or engages in Internet 943 gambling or any game at cards, keno, roulette, faro, or other 944 game of chance, at any place, by any device whatever, for money 945 or other thing of value, commits shall be guilty of a 946 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 947 775.082 or s. 775.083. 948 (3)âA person who plays or engages in Internet sports 949 wagering commits: 950 (a)âFor a first violation, a misdemeanor of the second 951 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 952 (b)âFor a second or subsequent violation, a misdemeanor of 953 the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 954 775.083. 955 (4)âA person who operates, conducts, or promotes Internet 956 gambling or Internet sports wagering, or receives in any manner 957 money or other thing of value offered for the purpose of 958 Internet gambling or Internet sports wagering, or who knowingly 959 becomes the custodian or depositary of any money or other thing 960 of value so offered, or who aids, assists, abets, or influences 961 in any manner in any such acts, commits a felony of the third 962 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 963 775.084. 964 (5)âThis section does not apply to participation in, or the 965 conduct of, any gaming activities authorized under s. 966 285.710(13) and conducted pursuant to a gaming compact ratified 967 and approved under s. 285.710(3). 968 Section 18.âParagraph (e) is added to subsection (12) of 969 section 849.086, Florida Statutes, to read: 970 849.086âCardrooms authorized.â 971 (12)âPROHIBITED ACTIVITIES.â 972 (e)âA person who manipulates or attempts to manipulate the 973 playing cards, outcome, or payoff of a card game in a licensed 974 cardroom by physical tampering or by use of any object, 975 instrument, or device, whether mechanical, electrical, magnetic, 976 or involving other means, commits a felony of the third degree, 977 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 978 Section 19.âSection 849.09, Florida Statutes, is 979 republished to read: 980 849.09âLottery prohibited; exceptions.â 981 (1)âIt is unlawful for any person in this state to: 982 (a)âSet up, promote, or conduct any lottery for money or 983 for anything of value; 984 (b)âDispose of any money or other property of any kind 985 whatsoever by means of any lottery; 986 (c)âConduct any lottery drawing for the distribution of a 987 prize or prizes by lot or chance, or advertise any such lottery 988 scheme or device in any newspaper or by circulars, posters, 989 pamphlets, radio, telegraph, telephone, or otherwise; 990 (d)âAid or assist in the setting up, promoting, or 991 conducting of any lottery or lottery drawing, whether by 992 writing, printing, or in any other manner whatsoever, or be 993 interested in or connected in any way with any lottery or 994 lottery drawing; 995 (e)âAttempt to operate, conduct, or advertise any lottery 996 scheme or device; 997 (f)âHave in her or his possession any lottery wheel, 998 implement, or device whatsoever for conducting any lottery or 999 scheme for the disposal by lot or chance of anything of value; 1000 (g)âSell, offer for sale, or transmit, in person or by mail 1001 or in any other manner whatsoever, any lottery ticket, coupon, 1002 or share, or any share in or fractional part of any lottery 1003 ticket, coupon, or share, whether such ticket, coupon, or share 1004 represents an interest in a live lottery not yet played or 1005 whether it represents, or has represented, an interest in a 1006 lottery that has already been played; 1007 (h)âHave in her or his possession any lottery ticket, or 1008 any evidence of any share or right in any lottery ticket, or in 1009 any lottery scheme or device, whether such ticket or evidence of 1010 share or right represents an interest in a live lottery not yet 1011 played or whether it represents, or has represented, an interest 1012 in a lottery that has already been played; 1013 (i)âAid or assist in the sale, disposal, or procurement of 1014 any lottery ticket, coupon, or share, or any right to any 1015 drawing in a lottery; 1016 (j)âHave in her or his possession any lottery 1017 advertisement, circular, poster, or pamphlet, or any list or 1018 schedule of any lottery prizes, gifts, or drawings; or 1019 (k)âHave in her or his possession any so-called ârun down 1020 sheets,â tally sheets, or other papers, records, instruments, or 1021 paraphernalia designed for use, either directly or indirectly, 1022 in, or in connection with, the violation of the laws of this 1023 state prohibiting lotteries and gambling. 1024 1025 Provided, that nothing in this section shall prohibit 1026 participation in any nationally advertised contest, drawing, 1027 game or puzzle of skill or chance for a prize or prizes unless 1028 it can be construed as a lottery under this section; and, 1029 provided further, that this exemption for national contests 1030 shall not apply to any such contest based upon the outcome or 1031 results of any horserace, harness race, dograce, or jai alai 1032 game. 1033 (2)âAny person who is convicted of violating any of the 1034 provisions of paragraph (a), paragraph (b), paragraph (c), or 1035 paragraph (d) of subsection (1) is guilty of a felony of the 1036 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 1037 or s. 775.084. 1038 (3)âAny person who is convicted of violating any of the 1039 provisions of paragraph (e), paragraph (f), paragraph (g), 1040 paragraph (i), or paragraph (k) of subsection (1) is guilty of a 1041 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 1042 775.082 or s. 775.083. Any person who, having been convicted of 1043 violating any provision thereof, thereafter violates any 1044 provision thereof is guilty of a felony of the third degree, 1045 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 1046 The provisions of this section do not apply to bingo as provided 1047 for in s. 849.0931. 1048 (4)âAny person who is convicted of violating any of the 1049 provisions of paragraph (h) or paragraph (j) of subsection (1) 1050 is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as 1051 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. Any person who, having 1052 been convicted of violating any provision thereof, thereafter 1053 violates any provision thereof is guilty of a felony of the 1054 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 1055 or s. 775.084. 1056 Section 20.âSection 849.11, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1057 read: 1058 849.11âPlays at games of chance by lot.â 1059 (1)âA person who Whoever sets up, promotes or plays in 1060 person or by the use, in whole or in part, of the Internet, at 1061 any game of chance by lot or with dice, cards, numbers, hazards 1062 or any other gambling device whatever for, or for the disposal 1063 of money or other thing of value or under the pretext of a sale, 1064 gift or delivery thereof, or for any right, share or interest 1065 therein, commits shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the second 1066 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 1067 (2)âA person who sets up, operates, conducts, promotes, or 1068 receives in any manner any money or other thing of value offered 1069 for the purpose of conduct prohibited in subsection (1), or who 1070 knowingly becomes the custodian or depositary of any money or 1071 other thing of value so offered, or who aids, assists, abets, or 1072 influences in any manner in any such acts, commits a felony of 1073 the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 1074 775.083, or s. 775.084. 1075 Section 21.âSection 849.13, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1076 read: 1077 849.13âPunishment on second or subsequent conviction.âA 1078 person who is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of 1079 the same Whoever, after being convicted of an offense forbidden 1080 by law in connection with lotteries for which there is no 1081 penalty specified for a second or subsequent violation shall 1082 have the offense reclassified to an offense of the next higher 1083 degree, commits the like offense, shall be guilty of a 1084 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 1085 775.082, or s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. For purposes of 1086 sentencing under chapter 921, a felony offense that is 1087 reclassified under this section is ranked one level above the 1088 ranking under s. 921.0022 or s. 921.0023 of the felony offense 1089 committed. 1090 Section 22.âSection 849.14, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1091 read: 1092 849.14âUnlawful to bet on result of trial or contest of 1093 skill, etc.âA person who Whoever stakes, bets, or wagers any 1094 money or other thing of value upon the result of any trial or 1095 contest of skill, speed or power or endurance of human or beast, 1096 or who whoever receives in any manner whatsoever any money or 1097 other thing of value staked, bet, or wagered, or offered for the 1098 purpose of being staked, bet, or wagered, by or for any other 1099 person upon any such result, or who whoever knowingly becomes 1100 the custodian or depositary of any money or other thing of value 1101 so staked, bet, or wagered upon any such result, or who whoever 1102 aids, or assists, or abets, or influences in any manner in any 1103 of such acts all of which are hereby forbidden, commits a felony 1104 of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, or s. 1105 775.083, or s. 775.084. 1106 Section 23.âSubsection (7) is added to section 849.142, 1107 Florida Statutes, to read: 1108 849.142âExempted activities.âSections 849.01, 849.08, 1109 849.09, 849.11, 849.14, and 849.25 do not apply to participation 1110 in or the conduct of any of the following activities: 1111 (7)âFantasy sports contests conducted pursuant to s. 1112 849.143. 1113 Section 24.âSection 849.143, Florida Statutes, is created 1114 to read: 1115 849.143âFantasy sports contests authorized.â 1116 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 1117 (a)ââChange of ownershipâ means: 1118 1.âAn event in which the contest operator sells or 1119 otherwise transfers its ownership to a different individual or 1120 entity, as evidenced by a change in federal employer 1121 identification number or taxpayer identification number; or 1122 2.âAn event in which the ownership, shares, membership, or 1123 controlling interest of a contest operator is in any manner 1124 transferred or otherwise assigned. This subparagraph does not 1125 apply to a contest operator that is publicly traded on a 1126 recognized stock exchange. 1127 (b)ââCommissionâ means the Florida Gaming Control 1128 Commission. 1129 (c)ââConfidential informationâ means information related to 1130 the playing of fantasy sports contests by contest participants 1131 which is obtained solely as a result of a personâs employment 1132 with, or work as an agent of, a contest operator. 1133 (d)ââContest operatorâ means a person or an entity that 1134 offers fantasy sports contests for a cash prize. The term does 1135 not include noncommercial contest operators. 1136 (e)ââContest participantâ means a person who pays an entry 1137 fee for the ability to participate in a fantasy sports contest 1138 offered by a contest operator or noncommercial contest operator. 1139 (f)ââControlling interestâ means a person or entity that 1140 serves as an officer of, is on the board of directors of, or has 1141 a 5 percent or greater ownership interest in the contest 1142 operator; or the ultimate equitable owner, as such term is 1143 defined in s. 550.002. 1144 (g)ââConvictedâ means having been found guilty, with or 1145 without adjudication of guilt, as a result of a jury verdict, 1146 nonjury trial, or entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere. 1147 (h)ââEntry feeâ means the cash or cash equivalent amount 1148 that a person is required to pay to a contest operator or 1149 noncommercial contest operator to participate in a fantasy 1150 sports contest. 1151 (i)ââFantasy sports contestâ means a fantasy or simulation 1152 sports game or contest with an entry fee and a prize or award in 1153 which a contest participant manages a fantasy or simulation 1154 sports team composed of athletes from a professional sports 1155 organization and which meets each of the following requirements: 1156 1.âAll prizes and awards offered to winning contest 1157 participants are established and made known to the contest 1158 participants in advance of the game or contest, and the value is 1159 not determined by the number of contest participants or by the 1160 amount of any fees paid by those contest participants. 1161 2.âAll winning outcomes reflect the relative knowledge and 1162 skill of the contest participants and are determined 1163 predominantly by accumulated statistical results of the 1164 performance of individuals, including athletes in the case of 1165 sporting events. 1166 3.âNo winning outcome is based on the score, point spread, 1167 or any performance or performances of any single actual team or 1168 combination of such teams; solely on any single performance of 1169 an individual athlete or player in any single actual event; on a 1170 pari-mutuel event, as the term pari-mutuel is defined in s. 1171 550.002, as of January 1, 2021, on a game of poker or other card 1172 game; or on the performances of participants in collegiate, high 1173 school, or youth sporting events. 1174 4.âNo casino graphics, themes, or titles, including, but 1175 not limited to, depictions of slot machine-style symbols, cards, 1176 dice, craps, roulette, or lotto, are displayed or depicted. 1177 (j)ââFantasy sports contest systemâ means the formal 1178 electronic system implemented by a contest operator to register 1179 contest participants and create participant accounts for 1180 participation in fantasy sports contests and to record a contest 1181 participantâs athlete selections, entry fees, prizes, or awards, 1182 and other activities related to participation in fantasy sports 1183 contest offered or operated by the contest operator. 1184 (k)ââFantasy sports contest revenuesâ means the total of 1185 all cash and property received by the contest operator from the 1186 operation of fantasy sports contests less the amount of cash, 1187 cash equivalents, credits, and prizes paid to winners of fantasy 1188 sports contests. 1189 (l)ââKey employeeâ means an individual who is employed by 1190 an applicant for a contest operator license or by a contest 1191 operator in a director or department head capacity or who is 1192 authorized to make discretionary decisions that regulate fantasy 1193 sports contest operations. 1194 (m)ââNoncommercial contest operatorâ means a natural person 1195 who organizes and conducts a fantasy sports contest in which 1196 contest participants are charged entry fees for the right to 1197 participate; entry fees are collected, maintained, and 1198 distributed by the same natural person; the total entry fees 1199 collected, maintained, and distributed by such natural person do 1200 not exceed $1,500 per season or $10,000 per calendar year; and 1201 all entry fees are returned to the contest participants in the 1202 form of prizes. 1203 (n)ââPrincipalâ means any owner; ultimate equitable owner, 1204 as that term is defined in s. 550.002; shareholder; corporate 1205 officer or director; general partner; trustee; or beneficiary. 1206 (o)ââProposition selectionâ means a contest participant 1207 choosing whether one or more identified instances or statistical 1208 achievements within a sporting event, competition, or contest 1209 will or will not occur, be achieved, or be surpassed, or 1210 engaging in any other in-play wagering in which a contest 1211 participant wagers on a specific outcome or combinations of 1212 outcomes within such sporting event, competition, or contest. 1213 (p)ââRelativeâ means a spouse, father, mother, son, 1214 daughter, grandfather, grandmother, brother, sister, uncle, 1215 aunt, cousin, nephew, niece, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son 1216 in-law, daughter-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, 1217 stepfather, stepmother, stepson, stepdaughter, stepbrother, 1218 stepsister, half-brother, or half-sister. 1219 (q)ââSports bettingâ means wagering on any past or future 1220 professional sport or athletic event, competition, or contest; 1221 any Olympic or international sports competition event; any 1222 collegiate sport or athletic event; any motor vehicle race; or 1223 any portion of any of the foregoing, including, but not limited 1224 to, the individual performance statistics of an athlete or other 1225 individual participant in any event or combination of events, or 1226 any other in-play wagering with respect to any such sporting 1227 event, competition, or contest. 1228 (2)âPOWER AND DUTIES OF THE COMMISSION; RULEMAKING.â 1229 (a)âThe commission shall administer this section and 1230 regulate the operation and play of fantasy sports contests under 1231 this section and rules adopted pursuant thereto. 1232 (b)âThe commission is authorized to: 1233 1.âConduct investigations and monitor the operation of 1234 fantasy sports contests and fantasy sports contest systems 1235 necessary to fulfill its responsibilities under the provisions 1236 of this section. 1237 2.âReview the books, accounts, and records of any current 1238 or former contest operator. 1239 3.âTake testimony, issue summonses and subpoenas for any 1240 witness, and issue subpoenas duces tecum in connection with any 1241 matter within its jurisdiction. 1242 4.âMonitor and ensure the proper collection and 1243 safeguarding of entry fees and compliance with consumer 1244 protection procedures. 1245 (c)âThe commission may deny, suspend, revoke, or place 1246 conditions or restrictions on a contest operator license if the 1247 applicant or holder of the license: 1248 1.âKnowingly makes a false statement of material fact in 1249 the application or has deliberately failed to disclose any 1250 information requested. 1251 2.âFails to pay all outstanding fines or liens assessed by 1252 final order of the commission. 1253 3.âIs convicted, or if its principal or key employee has 1254 been convicted, in this state, any other state, or under the 1255 laws of the United States of a capital offense, a felony, an 1256 offense that would be a felony under the laws of this state 1257 involving arson; trafficking in, conspiracy to traffic in, 1258 smuggling, importing, conspiracy to smuggle or import, or 1259 delivery, sale, or distribution of a controlled substance as 1260 defined in s. 893.02(4); or a misdemeanor related to gaming or 1261 bookmaking, as defined in s. 849.25(1), or involves cruelty to 1262 animals. 1263 4.âViolates, or if its principal or key employee violates, 1264 this section or the rules of the commission adopted pursuant to 1265 this section. 1266 5.âHas been refused a license or had a license revoked, or 1267 if its principal or key employee has been refused a license or 1268 had a license revoked, by any other state gaming commission or 1269 gaming authority. 1270 6.âHas, or if its principal or key employee has, unpaid 1271 fines in another jurisdiction. 1272 1273 If an offense is not related to gambling and is not a capital 1274 offense, the commission may waive the restrictions in this 1275 paragraph upon the applicantâs or holderâs showing of 1276 rehabilitation and good moral character. The standard of review 1277 applicable to actions taken by the commission pursuant to this 1278 paragraph is whether the commissionâs action was an abuse of 1279 discretion. 1280 (d)âThe commission may adopt any rules necessary to 1281 implement, administer, and regulate the operation and play of 1282 fantasy sports contests pursuant to this section, including, but 1283 not limited to: 1284 1.âProcedures for applying for a contest operator license 1285 and renewal of a contest operator license. 1286 2.âThe operation of a fantasy sports contest. 1287 3.âProcedures to scientifically test and technically 1288 evaluate fantasy sports contest systems for compliance with this 1289 section and the rules adopted pursuant to this section. The 1290 commission may contract with an independent testing laboratory 1291 as that term is defined in s. 551.102 to conduct any necessary 1292 testing under this section. An independent testing laboratory 1293 may not be owned or controlled by a contest operator or its 1294 principals or key employees. The selection of an independent 1295 testing laboratory for any purpose related to the conduct of 1296 fantasy sports contests must be made from a list of one or more 1297 laboratories approved by the commission. 1298 4.âProcedures for regulating, managing, and auditing the 1299 operation, financial data, and program information relating to 1300 fantasy sports contests which allow the commission and the 1301 Department of Law Enforcement to audit the operation, financial 1302 data, and program information of a contest operator, as required 1303 by the commission or the Department of Law Enforcement, and 1304 provide the commission and the Department of Law Enforcement 1305 with the ability to monitor, on a real-time basis, contest 1306 participantsâ patterns, payouts, and compliance with this 1307 section and any rules adopted by the commission. 1308 5.âProcedures for requiring contest operators to maintain 1309 and furnish to the commission specified records and to submit 1310 any data, information, record, or report, including financial 1311 and income records, required by this section or determined by 1312 the commission to be necessary to the proper implementation and 1313 enforcement of this section. 1314 6.âProcedures for regulating contest operatorsâ compliance 1315 with the conditions on licensure and consumer protection 1316 requirements of this section. 1317 7.âProcedures relating to fantasy sports contest revenues, 1318 including verifying and accounting for such revenues, and 1319 auditing consistent with this section. 1320 (3)âLICENSING; RENEWAL; CHANGE OF OWNERSHIP.â 1321 (a)âA contest operator must be licensed by the commission 1322 to operate fantasy sports contests within this state. Licenses 1323 are effective for one year after issuance and must be renewed 1324 annually. Applications for an initial contest operator license, 1325 a license renewal, or a change of ownership are exempt from the 1326 90-day licensing requirement of s. 120.60(1). Within 120 days 1327 after receipt of a completed application, the commission shall 1328 approve or deny the application. 1329 (b)âAn application for initial licensure, license renewal, 1330 or change of ownership must be made to the commission on forms 1331 furnished by the commission, submitted under attestation and 1332 under penalty of perjury, in order to be accepted and considered 1333 timely. The application must contain information required by 1334 authorizing statutes and applicable rules and must include all 1335 of the following: 1336 1.âThe name, address, and social security number of the 1337 applicant. 1338 2.âIf the applicant is a corporation, the name of the state 1339 in which the applicant is incorporated and the name, address, 1340 and social security number of each key employee and principal 1341 who individually or in concert with a relative holds 5 percent 1342 or more interest in the corporation. 1343 3.âIf the applicant is a business entity other than a 1344 corporation, the name, address, and social security number of 1345 each key employee and principal who individually or in concert 1346 with a relative holds 5 percent or more equity, or who is a 1347 trustee or beneficiary of 5 percent or more of a trust. 1348 4.âThe name, address, and social security number of each of 1349 the corporationâs or other business entityâs equitable owners as 1350 defined in s. 550.002, unless the securities of the business 1351 entity are registered pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1352 1934, 15 U.S.C. ss. 78a-78kk, and either: 1353 a.âThe corporation or entity files with the United States 1354 Securities and Exchange Commission the reports as required by 1355 the act; or 1356 b.âThe securities of the corporation or entity are 1357 regularly traded on an established securities market in the 1358 United States. 1359 5.âIf the applicant is a corporation or other business 1360 entity, a certificate of status issued by the Department of 1361 State. 1362 6.âThe estimated number of fantasy sports contests to be 1363 conducted by the applicant annually. 1364 7.âA copy of the consumer protection procedures required by 1365 subsection (4). 1366 8.âDocumentation from an independent testing laboratory 1367 sufficient to evidence that the fantasy sports contest system is 1368 in compliance with this section. 1369 9.âA statement of the assets and liabilities of the 1370 applicant. 1371 10.âIf required by the commission, the names and addresses 1372 of the officers and directors of any creditor of the applicant 1373 and of stockholders who hold more than 10 percent of the stock 1374 of the creditor. 1375 11.âAny other information required by the commission. 1376 12.âFor each individual listed in an application as a key 1377 employee or principal, a complete set of fingerprints that has 1378 been taken in accordance with s. 943.053(13). 1379 a.âThe commission, vendor, entity, or agency shall forward 1380 the fingerprints to the Department of Law Enforcement for state 1381 processing, and the Department of Law Enforcement shall forward 1382 the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for 1383 national processing. 1384 b.âFingerprints submitted to the Department of Law 1385 Enforcement pursuant to this paragraph must be retained by the 1386 Department of Law Enforcement as provided in s. 943.05(2)(g) and 1387 (h) and, when the Department of Law Enforcement begins 1388 participation in the program, must be enrolled in the Federal 1389 Bureau of Investigationâs national retained print arrest 1390 notification program. The Department of Law Enforcement shall 1391 report to the commission any arrest record identified. 1392 c.âThe commission may, by rule, exempt certain groups of 1393 persons from the fingerprinting requirement. 1394 (c)âAn applicant shall pay the full cost of processing 1395 fingerprints and required documentation. 1396 (d)âAn applicant seeking to renew a license must update any 1397 changes in the applicantâs information which was submitted the 1398 previous year. 1399 1.âThe applicant shall attest, under penalty of perjury, 1400 that any revisions do not affect the applicantâs qualifications 1401 for license renewal. 1402 2.âUpon determination by the commission that the 1403 application for renewal is complete and qualifications have been 1404 met, the contests operator license may be renewed. 1405 (e)âA contest operator must submit an application for a 1406 change of ownership to the commission. A change of ownership 1407 interest of 5 percent or more must be approved by the commission 1408 before such change. A change of ownership interest in a contest 1409 operator of less than 5 percent must be reported to the 1410 commission within 20 days after the change. The commission may 1411 conduct an investigation to ensure that the license is properly 1412 updated to show the change in ownership or interest. 1413 (f)âNotwithstanding s. 120.60, the commission may summarily 1414 suspend the license of a contest operator if the contest 1415 operator fails to pay any administrative fine imposed by entry 1416 of a final order by the commission within 30 calendar days after 1417 the date of the final order, unless a notice of appeal of such 1418 final order has been filed and is pending. A suspension 1419 proceeding brought pursuant to ss. 120.569 and 120.57 must be 1420 promptly instituted and acted upon. Before the conclusion of any 1421 such appeal, the license of a contest operator may not be 1422 renewed, and an application for licensure as a contest operator 1423 may not be approved, if the contest operator or the applicant 1424 for licensure as a contest operator is liable for an outstanding 1425 administrative fine imposed under this section. 1426 (4)âCONDITIONS ON LICENSURE; CONSUMER PROTECTION.âAs a 1427 condition of licensure, the contest operator must: 1428 (a)âImplement and maintain a fantasy sports contest system 1429 that is scientifically tested and technically evaluated by an 1430 independent testing laboratory for compliance with this section. 1431 (b)âProhibit and prevent the contest operator or its 1432 principals, employees, and relatives or persons living in the 1433 same household as the principals or employees from competing in 1434 a fantasy sports contest that the contest operator conducts or 1435 offers. However, a contest operator may offer its principals and 1436 employees fantasy sports contests in which the principals and 1437 employees are the sole participants. 1438 (c)âProhibit and prevent the contest operator or its 1439 principals, employees, or agents from sharing with a third party 1440 confidential information that could affect fantasy sports 1441 contest play until the information has been made publicly 1442 available. 1443 (d)âVerify the age, location, and identity of any contest 1444 participant before making a deposit into a participantâs account 1445 in the fantasy sports contest system. No person under 21 years 1446 of age may be permitted to participate in a fantasy sports 1447 contest. 1448 (e)âProhibit and prevent an individual who is a player, a 1449 game official, or other participant in a professional sports 1450 organizationâs actual event from participating in a fantasy 1451 sports contest. 1452 (f)âAllow a person to restrict or prevent his or her own 1453 access to the fantasy sports contest system and fantasy sports 1454 contest for a specific period of time as determined by the 1455 person and to implement procedures to prevent the person from 1456 participating in the contest operatorâs fantasy contests. 1457 (g)âLimit the number of entries a single contest 1458 participant submits to each fantasy sports contest and take 1459 reasonable steps to prevent participants from submitting more 1460 than the allowable number of entries. 1461 (h)âSegregate contest participantsâ funds from operational 1462 funds or maintain a reserve in the form of cash, cash 1463 equivalents, payment processor reserves, payment processor 1464 receivables, an irrevocable letter of credit, a bond, or a 1465 combination thereof in the total amount of deposits in contest 1466 participantsâ accounts in the fantasy sports contest system. 1467 (i)âProvide winning contest participants with the 1468 information and documentation necessary to ensure the proper 1469 reporting of winnings to the Internal Revenue Service. 1470 (j)âContract with a third party to perform an independent 1471 audit, consistent with the standards established by the American 1472 Institute of Certified Public Accountants, to ensure compliance 1473 with this section. The contest operator shall submit the results 1474 of the independent audit to the commission no later than 120 1475 days after the end of each fiscal year. 1476 (k)âEnsure that any data source and the corresponding data 1477 stored in the fantasy sports contest system to determine the 1478 results of all fantasy sports contests offered by contest 1479 operators, other than noncommercial contest operators, is 1480 complete, accurate, reliable, and appropriate to settle the 1481 outcome of the fantasy sports contests for which it is used. The 1482 commission and the Department of Law Enforcement may audit the 1483 data source and the corresponding data to monitor compliance 1484 with this section. 1485 (l)âThe commission may adopt rules to implement this 1486 subsection. 1487 (5)âRECORD RETENTION AND REPORTS.âEach contest operator 1488 shall maintain daily records of its operations and detailed 1489 financial transactions for at least 5 years and make them 1490 available for audit and inspection by the commission or any law 1491 enforcement agencies during the contest operatorâs regular 1492 business hours. The commission may adopt rules to implement this 1493 subsection. 1494 (6)âPROHIBITIONS.â 1495 (a)âA noncommercial contest operator may not receive any 1496 consideration or commission for conducting a fantasy sports 1497 contest. 1498 (b)âContest operators or noncommercial contest operators 1499 may not accept an entry fee from or allow a person younger than 1500 21 years of age to become a participant in a fantasy contest. A 1501 person younger than 21 years of age may not be a contest 1502 operator or a noncommercial contest operator. 1503 (c)âContest operators may not allow a contest participant 1504 to enter a fantasy sports contest before establishing an account 1505 in the fantasy sports contest system. 1506 (d)âContest operators or noncommercial contest operators 1507 may not offer a fantasy sports contest that includes any of the 1508 following: 1509 1.âA contest participant making a proposition selection or 1510 having the effect of mimicking a proposition selection. 1511 2.âAny fantasy sports contest in which a contest 1512 participant competes against the contest operator or 1513 noncommercial contest operator. 1514 3.âA selection or assembly of a fantasy or simulation 1515 sports team which does not involve the knowledge and skill of a 1516 contest participant, including, but not limited to, any of the 1517 following: 1518 a.âAuto draft functionality, except for a fantasy sports 1519 contest in which a contest participant is required to exert 1520 knowledge and skill to rank, prioritize, or queue athletes 1521 before the draft or to assemble one or more fantasy or 1522 simulation sports teams from a pool of athletes drafted by a 1523 contest participant; 1524 b.âA contest participant selecting a fantasy or simulation 1525 sports team preselected by a contest operator; or 1526 c.âAny other means of fantasy or simulation sports team 1527 selection or assembly that does not involve the input or control 1528 of a contest participant. 1529 4.âAny fantasy sports contest that involves, results in, or 1530 has the effect of mimicking sports betting. 1531 5.âA fantasy sports contest in which any statistical 1532 results of the performance of any individual athletes which 1533 determine the outcome of the fantasy or simulation sports game 1534 have been partially or completely determined and are publicly 1535 known at the time any entry fee from any contest participant is 1536 to be collected. 1537 6.âAny fantasy sports contest that provides an 1538 instantaneous result or is based on a simulated season or games. 1539 7.âAny fantasy sports contests prohibited by the commission 1540 or by state or federal law. 1541 (e)âA contest operator may not alter rules established for 1542 a fantasy contest after a participant has entered the fantasy 1543 contest. 1544 (f)âA contest operator may not offer a fantasy sports 1545 contest to any person located on Indian lands in this state 1546 which are regulated under the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act 1547 defined in s. 285.710 and codified at 25 U.S.C. ss. 2701 et seq. 1548 and 18 U.S.C. ss. 1166-1168. For the purposes of identifying 1549 Indian lands, the commission may provide descriptions of such 1550 Indian lands to a contest operator seeking to operate in this 1551 state. 1552 (7)âPENALTIES; APPLICABILITY; EXEMPTION.â 1553 (a)âAs a penalty for any violation of this section, 1554 authorizing statutes, or applicable rules or the failure to 1555 comply with the terms of a final order issued by the commission, 1556 the commission may suspend or revoke any contest operator 1557 license issued under this section, or impose an administrative 1558 penalty as follows: 1559 1.âThe commission may impose an administrative fine not to 1560 exceed $25,000 for each violation against a contest operator. 1561 Each day of a violation constitutes a separate violation and is 1562 subject to a separate fine. 1563 2.âThe commission may impose an administrative fine not to 1564 exceed $5,000 for each violation against a principal or employee 1565 of a contest operator. Each day of a violation constitutes a 1566 separate violation and is subject to a separate fine. 1567 3.âFor fines imposed by final order of the commission and 1568 not subject to further appeal, the violator must pay the fine 1569 plus interest at the rate specified in s. 55.03 for each day 1570 beyond the date set by the commission for the payment of the 1571 administrative fine. 1572 4.âAll fines imposed and collected under this paragraph 1573 shall be deposited with the Chief Financial Officer to the 1574 credit of the Pari-mutuel Wagering Trust Fund. 1575 (b)âA noncommercial contest operator, contest operator, or 1576 a principal or employee thereof who violates this section 1577 commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in 1578 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 1579 (c)âAny person, other than a person who is a noncommercial 1580 contest operator, who operates a fantasy sports contest without 1581 a valid license issued as provided in this section commits a 1582 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 1583 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 1584 (d)âThe commission, any state attorney, the statewide 1585 prosecutor, or the Attorney General may seek a temporary or 1586 permanent injunction restraining further violation of this 1587 section, and such an injunction must be issued without a bond. 1588 (e)âThe penalties established in this subsection do not 1589 apply to violations committed by a contest operator which 1590 occurred before the issuance of a license under this section if 1591 the contest operator applies for a license within 90 days after 1592 the date the commission begins accepting applications and 1593 receives a license within 240 days after such date. (8)âSTATE 1594 REPORTING REQUIREMENTS.â 1595 (a)âEach contest operator shall file a report with the 1596 commission on the 5th day of each calendar month for contests 1597 conducted during the preceding calendar month. The report must 1598 be submitted under attestation, reporting all fantasy contest 1599 activities for the preceding calendar month, including entry 1600 fees, prize payouts, and other such information as may be 1601 prescribed by the commission. 1602 (b)âThe commission may adopt rules to implement this 1603 subsection. 1604 Section 25.âSection 849.15, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1605 read: 1606 849.15âManufacture, sale, possession, etc., of slot 1607 machines or devices prohibited.â 1608 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 1609 (a)ââConvictionâ means a determination of guilt which is 1610 the result of a plea or trial, regardless of whether 1611 adjudication is withheld or a plea of nolo contendere is 1612 entered. 1613 (b)ââPart thereofâ means any equipment, subassembly, or 1614 other part of a slot machine or device, whether attached to the 1615 slot machine or device or separate therefrom, which was used, 1616 attempted to be used, or intended to be used in connection with 1617 the play or operation of the slot machine or device. 1618 (c)ââPerson of authorityâ means a person who, at any 1619 business, establishment, premises, or other location at which a 1620 slot machine or device is offered for play, has: 1621 1.âActual authority to act on behalf of such business, 1622 establishment, premises, or other location; or 1623 2.âAny ownership interest in such business, establishment, 1624 premises, or other location. For purposes of this paragraph, the 1625 term âownership interestâ includes an officer, a director, or a 1626 managing member of the business, establishment, premises, or 1627 other location. 1628 (2)âIt is unlawful: 1629 (a)âTo manufacture, own, store, keep, possess, sell, rent, 1630 lease, let on shares, lend or give away, transport, or expose 1631 for sale or lease, or to offer to sell, rent, lease, let on 1632 shares, lend or give away, or permit the operation of, or for 1633 any person to permit to be placed, maintained, or used or kept 1634 in any room, space, or building owned, leased or occupied by the 1635 person or under the personâs management or control, any slot 1636 machine or device or any part thereof.; or 1637 (b)âTo make or to permit to be made with any person any 1638 agreement with reference to any slot machine or device, pursuant 1639 to which the user thereof, as a result of any element of chance 1640 or other outcome unpredictable to him or her, may become 1641 entitled to receive any money, credit, allowance, or thing of 1642 value or additional chance or right to use such machine or 1643 device, or to receive any check, slug, token or memorandum 1644 entitling the holder to receive any money, credit, allowance or 1645 thing of value. 1646 (3)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c), a 1647 person who violates subsection (2) commits a misdemeanor of the 1648 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 1649 775.083. 1650 (b)âA person commits a felony of the third degree, 1651 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, 1652 if he or she violates subsection (2), and: 1653 1.âAt the time of the violation, the person was a person of 1654 authority; or 1655 2.âThe person has one prior conviction for a violation of 1656 this section. 1657 (c)âA person commits a felony of the second degree, 1658 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, 1659 if he or she violates subsection (2), and: 1660 1.a.âAt the time of the violation, the person was a person 1661 of authority; and 1662 b.âThe violation involves five or more slot machines or 1663 devices; or 1664 2.âThe person has two or more prior convictions for a 1665 violation of this section. 1666 (4)(2)âPursuant to section 2 of that chapter of the 1667 Congress of the United States entitled âAn act to prohibit 1668 transportation of gaming devices in interstate and foreign 1669 commerce,â approved January 2, 1951, being ch. 1194, 64 Stat. 1670 1134, and also designated as 15 U.S.C. ss. 1171-1177, the State 1671 of Florida, acting by and through the duly elected and qualified 1672 members of its Legislature, does hereby in this section, and in 1673 accordance with and in compliance with the provisions of section 1674 2 of such chapter of Congress, declare and proclaim that any 1675 county of the State of Florida within which slot machine gaming 1676 is authorized pursuant to chapter 551 is exempt from the 1677 provisions of section 2 of that chapter of the Congress of the 1678 United States entitled âAn act to prohibit transportation of 1679 gaming devices in interstate and foreign commerce,â designated 1680 as 15 U.S.C. ss. 1171-1177, approved January 2, 1951. All 1681 shipments of gaming devices, including slot machines, into any 1682 county of this state within which slot machine gaming is 1683 authorized pursuant to chapter 551 and the registering, 1684 recording, and labeling of which have been duly performed by the 1685 manufacturer or distributor thereof in accordance with sections 1686 3 and 4 of that chapter of the Congress of the United States 1687 entitled âAn act to prohibit transportation of gaming devices in 1688 interstate and foreign commerce,â approved January 2, 1951, 1689 being ch. 1194, 64 Stat. 1134, and also designated as 15 U.S.C. 1690 ss. 1171-1177, are shall be deemed legal shipments thereof into 1691 this state provided the destination of such shipments is an 1692 eligible facility as defined in s. 551.102 or the facility of a 1693 slot machine manufacturer or slot machine distributor as 1694 provided in s. 551.109(2)(a). 1695 (5)âAll shipments of legal gaming devices, including legal 1696 slot machines, into Indian lands located within this state are 1697 deemed legal shipments, provided that such Indian lands are held 1698 in federal trust for the benefit of a federally recognized 1699 Indian tribe that is a party to a tribal-state compact with the 1700 state pursuant to the federal Indian Gaming Regulatory Act of 1701 1988, 18 U.S.C. ss. 1166-1168 and 25 U.S.C. ss. 2701 et seq. 1702 Section 26.âSection 849.155, Florida Statutes, is created 1703 to read: 1704 849.155âTrafficking in slot machines, devices, or parts 1705 thereof.â 1706 (1)âAny person who knowingly sells, purchases, 1707 manufactures, transports, delivers, or brings into this state 1708 more than 15 slot machines or devices or any parts thereof 1709 commits a felony of the first degree, punishable as provided in 1710 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. For purposes of this 1711 section, the term âparts thereofâ has the same meaning as in s. 1712 849.15. If the quantity of slot machines or devices or any parts 1713 thereof involved is: 1714 (a)âMore than 15 slot machines or devices or any parts 1715 thereof, but fewer than 25 slot machines or devices or any parts 1716 thereof, such person must be fined $100,000. 1717 (b)âMore than 25 slot machines or devices or any parts 1718 thereof, but fewer than 50 slot machines or devices or any parts 1719 thereof, such person must be fined $250,000. 1720 (c)âMore than 50 slot machines or devices or any parts 1721 thereof or more, such person must be fined $500,000. 1722 (2)âPursuant to section 2 of that chapter of the Congress 1723 of the United States entitled âAn act to prohibit transportation 1724 of gaming devices in interstate and foreign commerce,â approved 1725 January 2, 1951, being ch. 1194, 64 Stat. 1134, and also 1726 designated as 15 U.S.C. ss. 1171-1177, relating to 1727 transportation of gambling devices in interstate and foreign 1728 commerce, the State of Florida, acting by and through the duly 1729 elected and qualified members of its Legislature, does hereby in 1730 this section, and in accordance with and in compliance with 1731 section 2 of such chapter of Congress, declare and proclaim that 1732 any county of the State of Florida within which slot machine 1733 gaming is authorized pursuant to chapter 551 is exempt from 1734 section 2 of that chapter of the Congress of the United States 1735 entitled âAn act to prohibit transportation of gaming devices in 1736 interstate and foreign commerce,â designated as 15 U.S.C. ss. 1737 1171-1177, approved January 2, 1951. All shipments of slot 1738 machines into any county of this state in which slot machine 1739 gaming is authorized pursuant to chapter 551 and the 1740 registering, recording, and labeling of which have been duly 1741 performed by the manufacturer or distributor thereof in 1742 accordance with sections 3 and 4 of that chapter of the Congress 1743 of the United States entitled âAn act to prohibit transportation 1744 of gaming devices in interstate and foreign commerce,â approved 1745 January 2, 1951, being ch. 1194, 64 Stat. 1134, and also 1746 designated as 15 U.S.C. ss. 1171-1177, are deemed legal 1747 shipments thereof into this state, provided the destination of 1748 such shipments is an eligible facility as defined in s. 551.102 1749 or the facility of a slot machine manufacturer or slot machine 1750 distributor as provided in s. 551.109(2)(a). 1751 (3)âAll shipments of legal gaming devices, including legal 1752 slot machines, into Indian lands located within this state are 1753 deemed legal shipments thereof, provided that such Indian lands 1754 are held in federal trust for the benefit of a federally 1755 recognized Indian tribe that is a party to a tribal-state 1756 compact with the state pursuant to the federal Indian Gaming 1757 Regulatory Act of 1988, 18 U.S.C. ss. 1166-1168 and 25 U.S.C. 1758 ss. 2701 et seq. 1759 1760 Notwithstanding any other law, all fines imposed and collected 1761 pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Pari-mutuel 1762 Wagering Trust Fund to be used by the Florida Gaming Control 1763 Commission for the enforcement of this chapter and chapters 546, 1764 550, and 551. 1765 Section 27.âSection 849.157, Florida Statutes, is created 1766 to read: 1767 849.157âMaking a false or misleading statement regarding 1768 the legality of slot machines or devices to facilitate sale.â 1769 (1)âExcept as provided in subsection (2), a person may not 1770 knowingly and willfully make a materially false or misleading 1771 statement or knowingly and willfully disseminate false or 1772 misleading information regarding the legality of a slot machine 1773 or device for the purpose of facilitating the sale or delivery 1774 of such slot machine or device for any money or other valuable 1775 consideration. A person who violates this subsection commits a 1776 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 1777 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 1778 (2)âA person who violates subsection (1), when such a 1779 violation involves the sale or delivery, or attempted sale or 1780 delivery, of five or more slot machines or devices, commits a 1781 felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 1782 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 1783 Section 28.âSection 849.18, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1784 read: 1785 849.18âDisposition of machines upon conviction.â 1786 (1)âFor any slot machine or device prohibited pursuant to 1787 s. 849.15 which is not destroyed pursuant to s. 849.181, upon 1788 entering a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, regardless of 1789 adjudication, the filing of a nolle prosequi or upon the 1790 successful completion of a diversion program or a deferred 1791 prosecution agreement, the filing of a no-information, or upon 1792 conviction of the person arrested for the violation of ss. 1793 849.15-849.22 any of the provisions of ss. 849.15-849.23, the 1794 judge of the court trying the case, after such notice to the 1795 person convicted, and any other person whom the judge may be of 1796 the opinion is entitled to such notice, and as the judge may 1797 deem reasonable, shall issue to the sheriff of the county a 1798 written order adjudging and declaring any such machine, 1799 apparatus or device forfeited, and directing such sheriff to 1800 destroy the same, with the exception of the money. The order of 1801 the court must shall state the time and place and the manner in 1802 which such property must shall be destroyed, and the sheriff 1803 shall destroy the same in the presence of the clerk of the 1804 circuit court of such county. 1805 (2)âFor any slot machine or device prohibited pursuant to 1806 s. 849.15 which is not destroyed pursuant to s. 849.181, if no 1807 arrests or criminal charges have been filed against any person 1808 for violations of ss. 849.15-849.22, the Florida Gaming Control 1809 Commission may destroy any seized machine, apparatus, or device 1810 under s. 849.16 if, 60 days after the conclusion of a lawful 1811 investigation, no claim has been filed in any court of competent 1812 jurisdiction for such machine, apparatus, or device. 1813 Section 29.âSection 849.181, Florida Statutes, is created 1814 to read: 1815 849.181âDestruction of excess machines.â 1816 (1)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to protect the 1817 public health, safety, and welfare of the residents of this 1818 state by removing slot machines or devices as defined in s. 1819 849.16 from public circulation and preventing the warehousing of 1820 large quantities of such slot machines or devices. 1821 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 1822 (a)ââCriminal justice agencyâ has the same meaning as 1823 provided in s. 943.045. 1824 (b)ââExcess slot machinesâ means more than five slot 1825 machines seized during an investigation. 1826 (c)ââSlot machineâ has the same meaning as the term âslot 1827 machine or deviceâ provided in s. 849.16 and includes the 1828 definition of âparts thereofâ provided in s. 849.15. 1829 (3)âNotwithstanding any other law, a criminal justice 1830 agency having custody of excess slot machines may destroy such 1831 slot machines during the pendency of any related legal 1832 proceedings or ongoing criminal investigations, provided that 1833 such criminal justice agency: 1834 (a)âRetains at least five slot machines seized during an 1835 investigation until such time as the slot machines may be 1836 destroyed as provided in s. 849.18; 1837 (b)âNotifies the appropriate United States Attorney or 1838 assistant United States Attorney, the responsible state or local 1839 prosecutor, or a criminal justice agency conducting a criminal 1840 investigation that the excess slot machines will be destroyed 1841 after 60 days from the date notice is provided, unless the 1842 entity receiving the notice under this paragraph requests in 1843 writing that the criminal justice agency not destroy the excess 1844 slot machines; 1845 (c)âPhotographs and records on video each excess slot 1846 machine before its destruction to serve as evidentiary exhibits 1847 for use at trial. Any photograph or video recording must include 1848 a written description of the name of the violator of this 1849 chapter, the location where the alleged violation occurred, the 1850 name of the investigating law enforcement officer, the date the 1851 photograph or video recording was taken, and the name of the 1852 photographer or videographer. Such writing must be made under 1853 oath by the investigating law enforcement officer, and the 1854 photograph and video recording must be authenticated by the 1855 photographerâs or videographerâs signature; 1856 (d)âDestroys each excess slot machine in the presence of a 1857 law enforcement officer. The law enforcement officer shall 1858 create a written and properly sworn documentation of the date, 1859 time, location, and number of excess slot machines destroyed; 1860 and 1861 (e)âMaintains the written and properly sworn documentation 1862 created by the witnessing law enforcement officer pursuant to 1863 paragraph (d) as required under s. 119.021. 1864 (4)âIn any prosecution for a violation of this chapter, a 1865 photograph and video recording of an excess slot machine 1866 captured and documented pursuant to paragraph (c) may be deemed 1867 competent evidence and may be admissible in the prosecution to 1868 the same extent as if such excess slot machine were introduced 1869 as evidence. 1870 (5)âIf any provision of this section or its application to 1871 any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does 1872 not affect other provisions or applications of this section or 1873 chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision 1874 or application, and to this end the provisions of this section 1875 are severable. 1876 Section 30.âSection 849.47, Florida Statutes, is created to 1877 read: 1878 849.47âTransporting or procuring the transportation of 1879 persons to facilitate illegal gambling.â 1880 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âillegal gamblingâ 1881 means any criminal violation of this chapter, chapter 546, 1882 chapter 550, or chapter 551 which occurs at any business, 1883 establishment, premises, or other location. 1884 (2)âExcept as provided in subsection (3), a person who 1885 knowingly and willfully transports, or procures the 1886 transportation of, five or more other persons into or within 1887 this state when he or she knows or reasonably should know that 1888 such transportation is for the purpose of facilitating illegal 1889 gambling, commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable 1890 as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 1891 (3)(a)âA person who transports, or procures the 1892 transportation of, a minor or a person 65 years of age or older 1893 into or within this state when he or she knows or reasonably 1894 should know that such transportation is for the purpose of 1895 facilitating illegal gambling commits a felony of the third 1896 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 1897 775.084. 1898 (b)âA person who transports, or procures the transportation 1899 of, 12 or more persons in violation of subsection (2) commits a 1900 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 1901 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 1902 Section 31.âSection 849.48, Florida Statutes, is created to 1903 read: 1904 849.48âGambling or gaming advertisements; prohibited.â 1905 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âillegal gamblingâ 1906 has the same meaning as in s. 849.47(1). 1907 (2)(a)âExcept as otherwise authorized by law, a person may 1908 not knowingly and intentionally make, publish, disseminate, 1909 circulate, or place before the public, or cause, directly or 1910 indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, or 1911 placed before the public in this state, in any manner, whether 1912 in person or by the use, at least in part, of the Internet, any 1913 advertisement, circular, bill, poster, pamphlet, list, schedule, 1914 announcement, or notice for the purpose of promoting or 1915 facilitating illegal gambling. 1916 (b)âExcept as otherwise authorized by law, a person may not 1917 set up any type or plate for any type of advertisement, 1918 circular, bill, poster, pamphlet, list, schedule, announcement, 1919 or notice when he or she knows or reasonably should know that 1920 such material will be used for the purpose of promoting or 1921 facilitating illegal gambling. 1922 (c)âA person who violates this subsection commits: 1923 1.âFor a first offense, a misdemeanor of the first degree, 1924 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 1925 2.âFor a second or subsequent offense, a felony of the 1926 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 1927 or s. 775.084. 1928 (3)âThis section does not prohibit the printing or 1929 producing of any advertisement, circular, bill, poster, 1930 pamphlet, list, schedule, announcement, or notice to be used for 1931 the purpose of promoting or facilitating gambling conducted in 1932 any other state or nation, outside of this state, where such 1933 gambling is not prohibited. 1934 Section 32.âSection 849.49, Florida Statutes, is created to 1935 read: 1936 849.49âPreemption.âA county, municipality, or other 1937 political subdivision of the state may not enact or enforce any 1938 ordinance or local rule relating to gaming, gambling, lotteries, 1939 or any activities described in this chapter or s. 546.10, except 1940 as otherwise expressly provided by general law, special law, or 1941 the State Constitution. 1942 Section 33.âSection 849.51, Florida Statutes, is created to 1943 read: 1944 849.51âLimited Slot Machine Surrender Program.â 1945 (1)âThe Legislature finds that illegal gaming operations 1946 not only undermine public trust but also expose citizens of this 1947 state to organized criminal conduct, financial exploitation, and 1948 a host of other social harms. Furthermore, the Legislature finds 1949 that certain persons or entities owning, storing, keeping, 1950 possessing, transporting, permitting the operation of, or 1951 otherwise offering illegal gaming devices for play may have been 1952 misled regarding the legality of the otherwise illegal gaming 1953 devices. Therefore, the Legislature finds that there is a 1954 compelling state interest in creating a limited period of time 1955 in which otherwise illegal gaming devices may be surrendered 1956 without penalty to ensure that any unknowing or otherwise 1957 innocent party may avoid criminal prosecution or civil penalty. 1958 (2)âThere is created within the commission the Limited Slot 1959 Machine Surrender Program. The purpose of the program is to 1960 allow individuals and organizations an opportunity to surrender 1961 or otherwise disclaim any and all interest in any gaming 1962 devices, including, but not limited to, those devices or games 1963 described in ss. 849.09 and 849.16, and devices or games 1964 purported to be authorized by ss. 546.10, 849.0931, 849.094, and 1965 849.14, and convey such gaming devices to the commission. The 1966 surrender of a gaming device pursuant to the program is deemed 1967 irrevocable and final. 1968 (3)âAny individual or organization that surrenders a gaming 1969 device to the commission pursuant to the program is immune from 1970 criminal prosecution for a violation of this chapter related to 1971 any of the surrendered devices. 1972 (4)âThe program shall begin by September 1, 2026, and end 1973 on October 1, 2026. 1974 (5)âThe commission shall advertise the program no earlier 1975 than 60 days before October 1, 2026. 1976 (6)âA person or an entity does not have any right of 1977 property in any of the devices surrendered to the commission 1978 pursuant to this section. 1979 (7)âThe commission may execute memoranda of understanding 1980 with other criminal justice agencies to administer the program. 1981 Section 34.âPresent paragraphs (i) through (m) of 1982 subsection (2) of section 903.046, Florida Statutes, are 1983 redesignated as paragraphs (j) through (n), respectively, and a 1984 new paragraph (i) is added to that subsection, to read: 1985 903.046âPurpose of and criteria for bail determination.â 1986 (2)âWhen determining whether to release a defendant on bail 1987 or other conditions, and what that bail or those conditions may 1988 be, the court shall consider: 1989 (i)âThe amount of currency seized which is connected to or 1990 involved in a violation of chapter 546, chapter 550, chapter 1991 551, or chapter 849. 1992 Section 35.âParagraphs (c), (e), (g), and (h) of subsection 1993 (3) of section 921.0022, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1994 921.0022âCriminal Punishment Code; offense severity ranking 1995 chart.â 1996 (3)âOFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART 1997 (c)âLEVEL 3 1998 1999 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 2000 119.10(2)(b) 3rd Unlawful use of confidential information from police reports. 2001 316.066â(3)(b)-(d) 3rd Unlawfully obtaining or using confidential crash reports. 2002 316.193(2)(b) 3rd Felony DUI, 3rd conviction. 2003 316.1935(2) 3rd Fleeing or attempting to elude law enforcement officer in patrol vehicle with siren and lights activated. 2004 319.30(4) 3rd Possession by junkyard of motor vehicle with identification number plate removed. 2005 319.33(1)(a) 3rd Alter or forge any certificate of title to a motor vehicle or mobile home. 2006 319.33(1)(c) 3rd Procure or pass title on stolen vehicle. 2007 319.33(4) 3rd With intent to defraud, possess, sell, etc., a blank, forged, or unlawfully obtained title or registration. 2008 327.35(2)(b) 3rd Felony BUI. 2009 328.05(2) 3rd Possess, sell, or counterfeit fictitious, stolen, or fraudulent titles or bills of sale of vessels. 2010 328.07(4) 3rd Manufacture, exchange, or possess vessel with counterfeit or wrong ID number. 2011 376.302(5) 3rd Fraud related to reimbursement for cleanup expenses under the Inland Protection Trust Fund. 2012 379.2431â(1)(e)5. 3rd Taking, disturbing, mutilating, destroying, causing to be destroyed, transferring, selling, offering to sell, molesting, or harassing marine turtles, marine turtle eggs, or marine turtle nests in violation of the Marine Turtle Protection Act. 2013 379.2431â(1)(e)6. 3rd Possessing any marine turtle species or hatchling, or parts thereof, or the nest of any marine turtle species described in the Marine Turtle Protection Act. 2014 379.2431â(1)(e)7. 3rd Soliciting to commit or conspiring to commit a violation of the Marine Turtle Protection Act. 2015 400.9935(4)(a)âor (b) 3rd Operating a clinic, or offering services requiring licensure, without a license. 2016 400.9935(4)(e) 3rd Filing a false license application or other required information or failing to report information. 2017 440.1051(3) 3rd False report of workersâ compensation fraud or retaliation for making such a report. 2018 501.001(2)(b) 2nd Tampers with a consumer product or the container using materially false/misleading information. 2019 624.401(4)(a) 3rd Transacting insurance without a certificate of authority. 2020 624.401(4)(b)1. 3rd Transacting insurance without a certificate of authority; premium collected less than $20,000. 2021 626.902(1)(a) &â(b) 3rd Representing an unauthorized insurer. 2022 697.08 3rd Equity skimming. 2023 790.15(3) 3rd Person directs another to discharge firearm from a vehicle. 2024 794.053 3rd Lewd or lascivious written solicitation of a person 16 or 17 years of age by a person 24 years of age or older. 2025 800.045(3) 3rd Possess, control, or intentionally view any photographic material, motion picture, etc., which includes a lewd or lascivious image. 2026 806.10(1) 3rd Maliciously injure, destroy, or interfere with vehicles or equipment used in firefighting. 2027 806.10(2) 3rd Interferes with or assaults firefighter in performance of duty. 2028 810.09(2)(b) 3rd Trespass on property other than structure or conveyance armed with firearm or dangerous weapon. 2029 810.145(2)(c) 3rd Digital voyeurism; 19 years of age or older. 2030 812.014(2)(c)2. 3rd Grand theft; $5,000 or more but less than $10,000. 2031 812.0145(2)(c) 3rd Theft from person 65 years of age or older; $300 or more but less than $10,000. 2032 812.015(8)(b) 3rd Retail theft with intent to sell; conspires with others. 2033 812.081(2) 3rd Theft of a trade secret. 2034 815.04(4)(b) 2nd Computer offense devised to defraud or obtain property. 2035 817.034(4)(a)3. 3rd Engages in scheme to defraud (Florida Communications Fraud Act), property valued at less than $20,000. 2036 817.233 3rd Burning to defraud insurer. 2037 817.234â(8)(b) & (c) 3rd Unlawful solicitation of persons involved in motor vehicle accidents. 2038 817.234(11)(a) 3rd Insurance fraud; property value less than $20,000. 2039 817.236 3rd Filing a false motor vehicle insurance application. 2040 817.2361 3rd Creating, marketing, or presenting a false or fraudulent motor vehicle insurance card. 2041 817.413(2) 3rd Sale of used goods of $1,000 or more as new. 2042 817.49(2)(b)1. 3rd Willful making of a false report of a crime causing great bodily harm, permanent disfigurement, or permanent disability. 2043 831.28(2)(a) 3rd Counterfeiting a payment instrument with intent to defraud or possessing a counterfeit payment instrument with intent to defraud. 2044 831.29 2nd Possession of instruments for counterfeiting driver licenses or identification cards. 2045 836.13(2) 3rd Generating an altered sexual depiction of an identifiable person without consent. 2046 836.13(4) 3rd Promoting, or possessing with intent to promote, an altered sexual depiction of an identifiable person without consent. 2047 838.021(3)(b) 3rd Threatens unlawful harm to public servant. 2048 838.12 3rd Bribery in athletic contests. 2049 847.01385 3rd Harmful communication to a minor. 2050 849.01(2)(a) 3rd Keeping a gambling house. 2051 849.01(3)(b) 3rd Knowingly benefitting from or participating in the operation of a gambling house. 2052 849.02(1)(b) & (2)(a) 3rd Agents or employees of keeper of gambling house. 2053 849.021(3)(a) 3rd Government employee misconduct relating to gambling houses. 2054 849.03(1)(a) 3rd Renting space at a gambling house. 2055 849.08(4) 3rd Internet wagering. 2056 849.086(12)(e) 3rd Manipulating playing cards. 2057 849.09(2) 3rd Illegal lottery. 2058 849.11(2) 3rd Operating or playing games of chance by lot. 2059 849.14 3rd Betting on result of trial or contest of skill. 2060 849.143(7)(b)&(c) 3rd Illegal fantasy sports contests 2061 849.15(3)(b) 3rd Manufacture, sale, possession, etc. of slot machines or devices. 2062 849.157(1) 3rd False or misleading statement to facilitate sale of slot machines or devices. 2063 849.25(2) 3rd Bookmaking. 2064 849.47(3)(a)&(b) 3rd Transporting or procuring transportation of certain persons to facilitate gambling. 2065 849.48(2)(c)2. 3rd Prohibited gambling or gaming advertisements. 2066 860.15(3) 3rd Overcharging for repairs and parts. 2067 870.01(2) 3rd Riot. 2068 870.01(4) 3rd Inciting a riot. 2069 893.13(1)(a)2. 3rd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cannabis (or other s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs). 2070 893.13(1)(d)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs within 1,000 feet of university. 2071 893.13(1)(f)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs within 1,000 feet of public housing facility. 2072 893.13(4)(c) 3rd Use or hire of minor; deliver to minor other controlled substances. 2073 893.13(6)(a) 3rd Possession of any controlled substance other than felony possession of cannabis. 2074 893.13(7)(a)8. 3rd Withhold information from practitioner regarding previous receipt of or prescription for a controlled substance. 2075 893.13(7)(a)9. 3rd Obtain or attempt to obtain controlled substance by fraud, forgery, misrepresentation, etc. 2076 893.13(7)(a)10. 3rd Affix false or forged label to package of controlled substance. 2077 893.13(7)(a)11. 3rd Furnish false or fraudulent material information on any document or record required by chapter 893. 2078 893.13(8)(a)1. 3rd Knowingly assist a patient, other person, or owner of an animal in obtaining a controlled substance through deceptive, untrue, or fraudulent representations in or related to the practitionerâs practice. 2079 893.13(8)(a)2. 3rd Employ a trick or scheme in the practitionerâs practice to assist a patient, other person, or owner of an animal in obtaining a controlled substance. 2080 893.13(8)(a)3. 3rd Knowingly write a prescription for a controlled substance for a fictitious person. 2081 893.13(8)(a)4. 3rd Write a prescription for a controlled substance for a patient, other person, or an animal if the sole purpose of writing the prescription is a monetary benefit for the practitioner. 2082 918.13(1) 3rd Tampering with or fabricating physical evidence. 2083 944.47â(1)(a)1. & 2. 3rd Introduce contraband to correctional facility. 2084 944.47(1)(c) 2nd Possess contraband while upon the grounds of a correctional institution. 2085 985.721 3rd Escapes from a juvenile facility (secure detention or residential commitment facility). 2086 (e)âLEVEL 5 2087 2088 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 2089 316.027(2)(a) 3rd Accidents involving personal injuries other than serious bodily injury, failure to stop; leaving scene. 2090 316.1935(3)(a) 2nd Driving at high speed or with wanton disregard for safety while fleeing or attempting to elude law enforcement officer who is in a patrol vehicle with siren and lights activated. 2091 316.80(2) 2nd Unlawful conveyance of fuel; obtaining fuel fraudulently. 2092 322.34(6) 3rd Careless operation of motor vehicle with suspended license, resulting in death or serious bodily injury. 2093 327.30(5)(a)2. 3rd Vessel accidents involving personal injuries other than serious bodily injury; leaving scene. 2094 365.172â(14)(b)2. 2nd Misuse of emergency communications system resulting in death. 2095 379.365(2)(c)1. 3rd Violation of rules relating to: willful molestation of stone crab traps, lines, or buoys; illegal bartering, trading, or sale, conspiring or aiding in such barter, trade, or sale, or supplying, agreeing to supply, aiding in supplying, or giving away stone crab trap tags or certificates; making, altering, forging, counterfeiting, or reproducing stone crab trap tags; possession of forged, counterfeit, or imitation stone crab trap tags; and engaging in the commercial harvest of stone crabs while license is suspended or revoked. 2096 379.367(4) 3rd Willful molestation of a commercial harvesterâs spiny lobster trap, line, or buoy. 2097 379.407(5)(b)3. 3rd Possession of 100 or more undersized spiny lobsters. 2098 381.0041(11)(b) 3rd Donate blood, plasma, or organs knowing HIV positive. 2099 440.10(1)(g) 2nd Failure to obtain workersâ compensation coverage. 2100 440.105(5) 2nd Unlawful solicitation for the purpose of making workersâ compensation claims. 2101 440.381(2) 3rd Submission of false, misleading, or incomplete information with the purpose of avoiding or reducing workersâ compensation premiums. 2102 624.401(4)(b)2. 2nd Transacting insurance without a certificate or authority; premium collected $20,000 or more but less than $100,000. 2103 626.902(1)(c) 2nd Representing an unauthorized insurer; repeat offender. 2104 790.01(3) 3rd Unlawful carrying of a concealed firearm. 2105 790.162 2nd Threat to throw or discharge destructive device. 2106 790.163(1) 2nd False report of bomb, explosive, weapon of mass destruction, or use of firearms in violent manner. 2107 790.221(1) 2nd Possession of short-barreled shotgun or machine gun. 2108 790.23 2nd Felons in possession of firearms, ammunition, or electronic weapons or devices. 2109 796.05(1) 2nd Live on earnings of a prostitute; 1st offense. 2110 800.04(6)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious conduct; offender less than 18 years of age. 2111 800.04(7)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition; offender 18 years of age or older. 2112 806.111(1) 3rd Possess, manufacture, or dispense fire bomb with intent to damage any structure or property. 2113 810.145(4) 3rd Commercial digital voyeurism dissemination. 2114 810.145(7)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; 2nd or subsequent offense. 2115 810.145(8)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain minor victims. 2116 812.014(2)(d)3. 2nd Grand theft, 2nd degree; theft from 20 or more dwellings or their unenclosed curtilage, or any combination. 2117 812.0145(2)(b) 2nd Theft from person 65 years of age or older; $10,000 or more but less than $50,000. 2118 812.015â(8)(a) & (c)-(e) 3rd Retail theft; property stolen is valued at $750 or more and one or more specified acts. 2119 812.015(8)(f) 3rd Retail theft; multiple thefts within specified period. 2120 812.015(8)(g) 3rd Retail theft; committed with specified number of other persons. 2121 812.019(1) 2nd Stolen property; dealing in or trafficking in. 2122 812.081(3) 2nd Trafficking in trade secrets. 2123 812.131(2)(b) 3rd Robbery by sudden snatching. 2124 812.16(2) 3rd Owning, operating, or conducting a chop shop. 2125 817.034(4)(a)2. 2nd Communications fraud, value $20,000 to $50,000. 2126 817.234(11)(b) 2nd Insurance fraud; property value $20,000 or more but less than $100,000. 2127 817.2341(1),â(2)(a) & (3)(a) 3rd Filing false financial statements, making false entries of material fact or false statements regarding property values relating to the solvency of an insuring entity. 2128 817.568(2)(b) 2nd Fraudulent use of personal identification information; value of benefit, services received, payment avoided, or amount of injury or fraud, $5,000 or more or use of personal identification information of 10 or more persons. 2129 817.611(2)(a) 2nd Traffic in or possess 5 to 14 counterfeit credit cards or related documents. 2130 817.625(2)(b) 2nd Second or subsequent fraudulent use of scanning device, skimming device, or reencoder. 2131 825.1025(4) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition in the presence of an elderly person or disabled adult. 2132 828.12(2) 3rd Tortures any animal with intent to inflict intense pain, serious physical injury, or death. 2133 836.14(4) 2nd Person who willfully promotes for financial gain a sexually explicit image of an identifiable person without consent. 2134 838.12 3rd Bribery in athletic contests(2nd or subsequent conviction). 2135 839.13(2)(b) 2nd Falsifying records of an individual in the care and custody of a state agency involving great bodily harm or death. 2136 843.01(1) 3rd Resist officer with violence to person; resist arrest with violence. 2137 847.0135(5)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition using computer; offender 18 years or older. 2138 847.0137â(2) & (3) 3rd Transmission of pornography by electronic device or equipment. 2139 847.0138â(2) & (3) 3rd Transmission of material harmful to minors to a minor by electronic device or equipment. 2140 849.01(2)(b) 2nd Keeping a gambling house (2nd or subsequent offense). 2141 849.02(1)(c)&(2)(b) 2nd Agents or employees of keeper of gambling house (2nd or subsequent offense). 2142 849.021(3)(b) 2nd Government employee misconduct relating to gambling houses (2nd or subsequent offense). 2143 849.03(1)(b) 2nd Renting space at a gambling house (2nd or subsequent offense). 2144 849.08(4) 2nd Operating, conducting, promoting, aiding, assisting, abetting, influencing Internet gambling and Internet sports wagering (2nd or subsequent conviction). 2145 849.086(12)(e) 2nd Tampering with cards or card games (2nd or subsequent conviction). 2146 849.11(2) 2nd Offenses related to games of chance (2nd or subsequent conviction). 2147 849.14 2nd Betting on result of trial or contest of skill (2nd or subsequent conviction). 2148 849.15(3)(c) 2nd Manufacture, sale, possession, etc. of slot machines or devices. 2149 849.47(3)(a)&(b) 2nd Transporting persons to facilitate illegal gambling; minor, person 65 years of age or older, or 12 or more persons (2nd or subsequent conviction). 2150 849.48(2)(c)2. 2nd Prohibited gambling or gaming advertisements (2nd or subsequent offense). 2151 874.05(1)(b) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting another to join a criminal gang; second or subsequent offense. 2152 874.05(2)(a) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting person under 13 years of age to join a criminal gang. 2153 893.13(1)(a)1. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs). 2154 893.13(1)(c)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cannabis (or other s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs) within 1,000 feet of a child care facility, school, or state, county, or municipal park or publicly owned recreational facility or community center. 2155 893.13(1)(d)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs) within 1,000 feet of university. 2156 893.13(1)(e)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cannabis or other drug prohibited under s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) within 1,000 feet of property used for religious services or a specified business site. 2157 893.13(1)(f)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), or (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs) within 1,000 feet of public housing facility. 2158 893.13(4)(b) 2nd Use or hire of minor; deliver to minor other controlled substance. 2159 893.1351(1) 3rd Ownership, lease, or rental for trafficking in or manufacturing of controlled substance. 2160 2161 (g)âLEVEL 7 2162 2163 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 2164 316.027(2)(c) 1st Accident involving death, failure to stop; leaving scene. 2165 316.193(3)(c)2. 3rd DUI resulting in serious bodily injury. 2166 316.1935(3)(b) 1st Causing serious bodily injury or death to another person; driving at high speed or with wanton disregard for safety while fleeing or attempting to elude law enforcement officer who is in a patrol vehicle with siren and lights activated. 2167 327.35(3)(a)3.b. 3rd Vessel BUI resulting in serious bodily injury. 2168 402.319(2) 2nd Misrepresentation and negligence or intentional act resulting in great bodily harm, permanent disfiguration, permanent disability, or death. 2169 409.920â(2)(b)1.a. 3rd Medicaid provider fraud; $10,000 or less. 2170 409.920â(2)(b)1.b. 2nd Medicaid provider fraud; more than $10,000, but less than $50,000. 2171 456.065(2) 3rd Practicing a health care profession without a license. 2172 456.065(2) 2nd Practicing a health care profession without a license which results in serious bodily injury. 2173 458.327(1) 3rd Practicing medicine without a license. 2174 459.013(1) 3rd Practicing osteopathic medicine without a license. 2175 460.411(1) 3rd Practicing chiropractic medicine without a license. 2176 461.012(1) 3rd Practicing podiatric medicine without a license. 2177 462.17 3rd Practicing naturopathy without a license. 2178 463.015(1) 3rd Practicing optometry without a license. 2179 464.016(1) 3rd Practicing nursing without a license. 2180 465.015(2) 3rd Practicing pharmacy without a license. 2181 466.026(1) 3rd Practicing dentistry or dental hygiene without a license. 2182 467.201 3rd Practicing midwifery without a license. 2183 468.366 3rd Delivering respiratory care services without a license. 2184 483.828(1) 3rd Practicing as clinical laboratory personnel without a license. 2185 483.901(7) 3rd Practicing medical physics without a license. 2186 484.013(1)(c) 3rd Preparing or dispensing optical devices without a prescription. 2187 484.053 3rd Dispensing hearing aids without a license. 2188 494.0018(2) 1st Conviction of any violation of chapter 494 in which the total money and property unlawfully obtained exceeded $50,000 and there were five or more victims. 2189 560.123(8)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report currency or payment instruments exceeding $300 but less than $20,000 by a money services business. 2190 560.125(5)(a) 3rd Money services business by unauthorized person, currency or payment instruments exceeding $300 but less than $20,000. 2191 655.50(10)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report financial transactions exceeding $300 but less than $20,000 by financial institution. 2192 775.21(10)(a) 3rd Sexual predator; failure to register; failure to renew driver license or identification card; other registration violations. 2193 775.21(10)(b) 3rd Sexual predator working where children regularly congregate. 2194 775.21(10)(g) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual predator; harbor or conceal a sexual predator. 2195 782.051(3) 2nd Attempted felony murder of a person by a person other than the perpetrator or the perpetrator of an attempted felony. 2196 782.07(1) 2nd Killing of a human being by the act, procurement, or culpable negligence of another (manslaughter). 2197 782.071 2nd Killing of a human being or unborn child by the operation of a motor vehicle in a reckless manner (vehicular homicide). 2198 782.072 2nd Killing of a human being by the operation of a vessel in a reckless manner (vessel homicide). 2199 784.045(1)(a)1. 2nd Aggravated battery; intentionally causing great bodily harm or disfigurement. 2200 784.045(1)(a)2. 2nd Aggravated battery; using deadly weapon. 2201 784.045(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated battery; perpetrator aware victim pregnant. 2202 784.048(4) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation of injunction or court order. 2203 784.048(7) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation of court order. 2204 784.07(2)(d) 1st Aggravated battery on law enforcement officer. 2205 784.074(1)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on sexually violent predators facility staff. 2206 784.08(2)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on a person 65 years of age or older. 2207 784.081(1) 1st Aggravated battery on specified official or employee. 2208 784.082(1) 1st Aggravated battery by detained person on visitor or other detainee. 2209 784.083(1) 1st Aggravated battery on code inspector. 2210 787.025(2)(b) 2nd Luring or enticing a child; second or subsequent offense. 2211 787.025(2)(c) 2nd Luring or enticing a child with a specified prior conviction. 2212 787.06(3)(a)2. 1st Human trafficking using coercion for labor and services of an adult. 2213 787.06(3)(e)2. 1st Human trafficking using coercion for labor and services by the transfer or transport of an adult from outside Florida to within the state. 2214 790.07(4) 1st Specified weapons violation subsequent to previous conviction of s. 790.07(1) or (2). 2215 790.16(1) 1st Discharge of a machine gun under specified circumstances. 2216 790.165(2) 2nd Manufacture, sell, possess, or deliver hoax bomb. 2217 790.165(3) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or threatening to use any hoax bomb while committing or attempting to commit a felony. 2218 790.166(3) 2nd Possessing, selling, using, or attempting to use a hoax weapon of mass destruction. 2219 790.166(4) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or threatening to use a hoax weapon of mass destruction while committing or attempting to commit a felony. 2220 790.23 1st,PBL Possession of a firearm by a person who qualifies for the penalty enhancements provided for in s. 874.04. 2221 794.08(4) 3rd Female genital mutilation; consent by a parent, guardian, or a person in custodial authority to a victim younger than 18 years of age. 2222 796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a prostitute; 2nd offense. 2223 796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a prostitute; 3rd and subsequent offense. 2224 800.04(5)(c)1. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim younger than 12 years of age; offender younger than 18 years of age. 2225 800.04(5)(c)2. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim 12 years of age or older but younger than 16 years of age; offender 18 years of age or older. 2226 800.04(5)(e) 1st Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim 12 years of age or older but younger than 16 years; offender 18 years or older; prior conviction for specified sex offense. 2227 806.01(2) 2nd Maliciously damage structure by fire or explosive. 2228 810.02(3)(a) 2nd Burglary of occupied dwelling; unarmed; no assault or battery. 2229 810.02(3)(b) 2nd Burglary of unoccupied dwelling; unarmed; no assault or battery. 2230 810.02(3)(d) 2nd Burglary of occupied conveyance; unarmed; no assault or battery. 2231 810.02(3)(e) 2nd Burglary of authorized emergency vehicle. 2232 812.014(2)(a)1. 1st Property stolen, valued at $100,000 or more or a semitrailer deployed by a law enforcement officer; property stolen while causing other property damage; 1st degree grand theft. 2233 812.014(2)(b)2. 2nd Property stolen, cargo valued at less than $50,000, grand theft in 2nd degree. 2234 812.014(2)(b)3. 2nd Property stolen, emergency medical equipment; 2nd degree grand theft. 2235 812.014(2)(b)4. 2nd Property stolen, law enforcement equipment from authorized emergency vehicle. 2236 812.014(2)(g) 2nd Grand theft; second degree; firearm with previous conviction of s. 812.014(2)(c)5. 2237 812.0145(2)(a) 1st Theft from person 65 years of age or older; $50,000 or more. 2238 812.019(2) 1st Stolen property; initiates, organizes, plans, etc., the theft of property and traffics in stolen property. 2239 812.131(2)(a) 2nd Robbery by sudden snatching. 2240 812.133(2)(b) 1st Carjacking; no firearm, deadly weapon, or other weapon. 2241 817.034(4)(a)1. 1st Communications fraud, value greater than $50,000. 2242 817.234(8)(a) 2nd Solicitation of motor vehicle accident victims with intent to defraud. 2243 817.234(9) 2nd Organizing, planning, or participating in an intentional motor vehicle collision. 2244 817.234(11)(c) 1st Insurance fraud; property value $100,000 or more. 2245 817.2341â(2)(b) & (3)(b) 1st Making false entries of material fact or false statements regarding property values relating to the solvency of an insuring entity which are a significant cause of the insolvency of that entity. 2246 817.418(2)(a) 3rd Offering for sale or advertising personal protective equipment with intent to defraud. 2247 817.504(1)(a) 3rd Offering or advertising a vaccine with intent to defraud. 2248 817.535(2)(a) 3rd Filing false lien or other unauthorized document. 2249 817.611(2)(b) 2nd Traffic in or possess 15 to 49 counterfeit credit cards or related documents. 2250 825.102(3)(b) 2nd Neglecting an elderly person or disabled adult causing great bodily harm, disability, or disfigurement. 2251 825.103(3)(b) 2nd Exploiting an elderly person or disabled adult and property is valued at $10,000 or more, but less than $50,000. 2252 827.03(2)(b) 2nd Neglect of a child causing great bodily harm, disability, or disfigurement. 2253 827.04(3) 3rd Impregnation of a child under 16 years of age by person 21 years of age or older. 2254 827.071(2) & (3) 2nd Use or induce a child in a sexual performance, or promote or direct such performance. 2255 827.071(4) 2nd Possess with intent to promote any photographic material, motion picture, etc., which includes child pornography. 2256 837.05(2) 3rd Giving false information about alleged capital felony to a law enforcement officer. 2257 838.015 2nd Bribery. 2258 838.016 2nd Unlawful compensation or reward for official behavior. 2259 838.021(3)(a) 2nd Unlawful harm to a public servant. 2260 838.22 2nd Bid tampering. 2261 843.0855(2) 3rd Impersonation of a public officer or employee. 2262 843.0855(3) 3rd Unlawful simulation of legal process. 2263 843.0855(4) 3rd Intimidation of a public officer or employee. 2264 847.0135(3) 3rd Solicitation of a child, via a computer service, to commit an unlawful sex act. 2265 847.0135(4) 2nd Traveling to meet a minor to commit an unlawful sex act. 2266 849.01(4) 2nd Keeping a gambling house; great bodily harm, permanent disability, or permanent disfigurement. 2267 849.157(2) 2nd False or misleading statement to facilitate sale of 5 or more slot machines or devices. 2268 872.06 2nd Abuse of a dead human body. 2269 874.05(2)(b) 1st Encouraging or recruiting person under 13 to join a criminal gang; second or subsequent offense. 2270 874.10 1st,PBL Knowingly initiates, organizes, plans, finances, directs, manages, or supervises criminal gang-related activity. 2271 893.13(1)(c)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other drug prohibited under s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.) within 1,000 feet of a child care facility, school, or state, county, or municipal park or publicly owned recreational facility or community center. 2272 893.13(1)(e)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine or other drug prohibited under s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5., within 1,000 feet of property used for religious services or a specified business site. 2273 893.13(4)(a) 1st Use or hire of minor; deliver to minor other controlled substance. 2274 893.135(1)(a)1. 1st Trafficking in cannabis, more than 25 lbs., less than 2,000 lbs. 2275 893.135â(1)(b)1.a. 1st Trafficking in cocaine, more than 28 grams, less than 200 grams. 2276 893.135â(1)(c)1.a. 1st Trafficking in illegal drugs, more than 4 grams, less than 14 grams. 2277 893.135â(1)(c)2.a. 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 28 grams or more, less than 50 grams. 2278 893.135â(1)(c)2.b. 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 50 grams or more, less than 100 grams. 2279 893.135â(1)(c)3.a. 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 7 grams or more, less than 14 grams. 2280 893.135â(1)(c)3.b. 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 14 grams or more, less than 25 grams. 2281 893.135â(1)(c)4.b.(I) 1st Trafficking in fentanyl, 4 grams or more, less than 14 grams. 2282 893.135â(1)(d)1.a. 1st Trafficking in phencyclidine, 28 grams or more, less than 200 grams. 2283 893.135(1)(e)1. 1st Trafficking in methaqualone, 200 grams or more, less than 5 kilograms. 2284 893.135(1)(f)1. 1st Trafficking in amphetamine, 14 grams or more, less than 28 grams. 2285 893.135â(1)(g)1.a. 1st Trafficking in flunitrazepam, 4 grams or more, less than 14 grams. 2286 893.135â(1)(h)1.a. 1st Trafficking in gamma-hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), 1 kilogram or more, less than 5 kilograms. 2287 893.135â(1)(j)1.a. 1st Trafficking in 1,4-Butanediol, 1 kilogram or more, less than 5 kilograms. 2288 893.135â(1)(k)2.a. 1st Trafficking in Phenethylamines, 10 grams or more, less than 200 grams. 2289 893.135â(1)(m)2.a. 1st Trafficking in synthetic cannabinoids, 280 grams or more, less than 500 grams. 2290 893.135â(1)(m)2.b. 1st Trafficking in synthetic cannabinoids, 500 grams or more, less than 1,000 grams. 2291 893.135â(1)(n)2.a. 1st Trafficking in n-benzyl phenethylamines, 14 grams or more, less than 100 grams. 2292 893.1351(2) 2nd Possession of place for trafficking in or manufacturing of controlled substance. 2293 896.101(5)(a) 3rd Money laundering, financial transactions exceeding $300 but less than $20,000. 2294 896.104(4)(a)1. 3rd Structuring transactions to evade reporting or registration requirements, financial transactions exceeding $300 but less than $20,000. 2295 943.0435(4)(c) 2nd Sexual offender vacating permanent residence; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 2296 943.0435(8) 2nd Sexual offender; remains in state after indicating intent to leave; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 2297 943.0435(9)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 2298 943.0435(13) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual offender; harbor or conceal a sexual offender. 2299 943.0435(14) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to report and reregister; failure to respond to address verification; providing false registration information. 2300 944.607(9) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 2301 944.607(10)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to submit to the taking of a digitized photograph. 2302 944.607(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual offender; harbor or conceal a sexual offender. 2303 944.607(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to report and reregister; failure to respond to address verification; providing false registration information. 2304 985.4815(10) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to submit to the taking of a digitized photograph. 2305 985.4815(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual offender; harbor or conceal a sexual offender. 2306 985.4815(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to report and reregister; failure to respond to address verification; providing false registration information. 2307 2308 (h)âLEVEL 8 2309 2310 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 2311 316.193â(3)(c)3.a. 2nd DUI manslaughter. 2312 316.1935(4)(b) 1st Aggravated fleeing or attempted eluding with serious bodily injury or death. 2313 327.35â(3)(a)3.c.(I) 2nd Vessel BUI manslaughter. 2314 499.0051(6) 1st Knowing trafficking in contraband prescription drugs. 2315 499.0051(7) 1st Knowing forgery of prescription labels or prescription drug labels. 2316 560.123(8)(b)2. 2nd Failure to report currency or payment instruments totaling or exceeding $20,000, but less than $100,000 by money transmitter. 2317 560.125(5)(b) 2nd Money transmitter business by unauthorized person, currency or payment instruments totaling or exceeding $20,000, but less than $100,000. 2318 655.50(10)(b)2. 2nd Failure to report financial transactions totaling or exceeding $20,000, but less than $100,000 by financial institutions. 2319 777.03(2)(a) 1st Accessory after the fact, capital felony. 2320 782.04(3) 1st Killing of a human being during the attempt or perpetration of certain felonies. 2321 782.04(4) 2nd Killing of human without design when engaged in act or attempt of any felony other than arson, sexual battery, robbery, burglary, kidnapping, aggravated fleeing or eluding with serious bodily injury or death, aircraft piracy, or unlawfully discharging bomb. 2322 782.051(2) 1st Attempted felony murder while perpetrating or attempting to perpetrate a felony not enumerated in s. 782.04(3). 2323 782.071(1)(b) 1st Committing vehicular homicide and failing to render aid or give information. 2324 782.071(1)(c) 1st Vehicular homicide with a prior conviction for DUI manslaughter, BUI manslaughter, vehicular homicide, or vessel homicide. 2325 782.072(2)(b) 1st Committing vessel homicide and failing to render aid or give information. 2326 782.072(3) 1st Vessel homicide with a prior conviction for DUI manslaughter, BUI manslaughter, vehicular homicide, or vessel homicide. 2327 787.06(3)(a)1. 1st Human trafficking for labor and services of a child. 2328 787.06(3)(b) 1st Human trafficking using coercion for commercial sexual activity of an adult. 2329 787.06(3)(c)2. 1st Human trafficking using coercion for labor and services of an unauthorized alien adult. 2330 787.06(3)(e)1. 1st Human trafficking for labor and services by the transfer or transport of a child from outside Florida to within the state. 2331 787.06(3)(f)2. 1st Human trafficking using coercion for commercial sexual activity by the transfer or transport of any adult from outside Florida to within the state. 2332 790.161(3) 1st Discharging a destructive device which results in bodily harm or property damage. 2333 794.011(5)(a) 1st Sexual battery; victim 12 years of age or older but younger than 18 years; offender 18 years or older; offender does not use physical force likely to cause serious injury. 2334 794.011(5)(b) 2nd Sexual battery; victim and offender 18 years of age or older; offender does not use physical force likely to cause serious injury. 2335 794.011(5)(c) 2nd Sexual battery; victim 12 years of age or older; offender younger than 18 years; offender does not use physical force likely to cause injury. 2336 794.011(5)(d) 1st Sexual battery; victim 12 years of age or older; offender does not use physical force likely to cause serious injury; prior conviction for specified sex offense. 2337 794.08(3) 2nd Female genital mutilation, removal of a victim younger than 18 years of age from this state. 2338 800.04(4)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious battery. 2339 800.04(4)(c) 1st Lewd or lascivious battery; offender 18 years of age or older; prior conviction for specified sex offense. 2340 806.01(1) 1st Maliciously damage dwelling or structure by fire or explosive, believing person in structure. 2341 810.02(2)(a) 1st,PBL Burglary with assault or battery. 2342 810.02(2)(b) 1st,PBL Burglary; armed with explosives or dangerous weapon. 2343 810.02(2)(c) 1st Burglary of a dwelling or structure causing structural damage or $1,000 or more property damage. 2344 812.014(2)(a)2. 1st Property stolen; cargo valued at $50,000 or more, grand theft in 1st degree. 2345 812.015(11)(b) 1st Retail theft; possession of a firearm during commission of offense. 2346 812.13(2)(b) 1st Robbery with a weapon. 2347 812.135(2)(c) 1st Home-invasion robbery, no firearm, deadly weapon, or other weapon. 2348 817.418(2)(b) 2nd Offering for sale or advertising personal protective equipment with intent to defraud; second or subsequent offense. 2349 817.504(1)(b) 2nd Offering or advertising a vaccine with intent to defraud; second or subsequent offense. 2350 817.505(4)(c) 1st Patient brokering; 20 or more patients. 2351 817.535(2)(b) 2nd Filing false lien or other unauthorized document; second or subsequent offense. 2352 817.535(3)(a) 2nd Filing false lien or other unauthorized document; property owner is a public officer or employee. 2353 817.535(4)(a)1. 2nd Filing false lien or other unauthorized document; defendant is incarcerated or under supervision. 2354 817.535(5)(a) 2nd Filing false lien or other unauthorized document; owner of the property incurs financial loss as a result of the false instrument. 2355 817.568(6) 2nd Fraudulent use of personal identification information of an individual under the age of 18. 2356 817.611(2)(c) 1st Traffic in or possess 50 or more counterfeit credit cards or related documents. 2357 825.102(2) 1st Aggravated abuse of an elderly person or disabled adult. 2358 825.1025(2) 2nd Lewd or lascivious battery upon an elderly person or disabled adult. 2359 825.103(3)(a) 1st Exploiting an elderly person or disabled adult and property is valued at $50,000 or more. 2360 837.02(2) 2nd Perjury in official proceedings relating to prosecution of a capital felony. 2361 837.021(2) 2nd Making contradictory statements in official proceedings relating to prosecution of a capital felony. 2362 849.155 1st Trafficking in slot machines or devices. 2363 860.121(2)(c) 1st Shooting at or throwing any object in path of railroad vehicle resulting in great bodily harm. 2364 860.16 1st Aircraft piracy. 2365 893.13(1)(b) 1st Sell or deliver in excess of 10 grams of any substance specified in s. 893.03(1)(a) or (b). 2366 893.13(2)(b) 1st Purchase in excess of 10 grams of any substance specified in s. 893.03(1)(a) or (b). 2367 893.13(6)(c) 1st Possess in excess of 10 grams of any substance specified in s. 893.03(1)(a) or (b). 2368 893.135(1)(a)2. 1st Trafficking in cannabis, more than 2,000 lbs., less than 10,000 lbs. 2369 893.135â(1)(b)1.b. 1st Trafficking in cocaine, more than 200 grams, less than 400 grams. 2370 893.135â(1)(c)1.b. 1st Trafficking in illegal drugs, more than 14 grams, less than 28 grams. 2371 893.135â(1)(c)2.c. 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 100 grams or more, less than 300 grams. 2372 893.135â(1)(c)3.c. 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 25 grams or more, less than 100 grams. 2373 893.135â(1)(c)4.b.(II) 1st Trafficking in fentanyl, 14 grams or more, less than 28 grams. 2374 893.135â(1)(d)1.b. 1st Trafficking in phencyclidine, 200 grams or more, less than 400 grams. 2375 893.135â(1)(e)1.b. 1st Trafficking in methaqualone, 5 kilograms or more, less than 25 kilograms. 2376 893.135â(1)(f)1.b. 1st Trafficking in amphetamine, 28 grams or more, less than 200 grams. 2377 893.135â(1)(g)1.b. 1st Trafficking in flunitrazepam, 14 grams or more, less than 28 grams. 2378 893.135â(1)(h)1.b. 1st Trafficking in gamma-hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), 5 kilograms or more, less than 10 kilograms. 2379 893.135â(1)(j)1.b. 1st Trafficking in 1,4-Butanediol, 5 kilograms or more, less than 10 kilograms. 2380 893.135â(1)(k)2.b. 1st Trafficking in Phenethylamines, 200 grams or more, less than 400 grams. 2381 893.135â(1)(m)2.c. 1st Trafficking in synthetic cannabinoids, 1,000 grams or more, less than 30 kilograms. 2382 893.135â(1)(n)2.b. 1st Trafficking in n-benzyl phenethylamines, 100 grams or more, less than 200 grams. 2383 893.1351(3) 1st Possession of a place used to manufacture controlled substance when minor is present or resides there. 2384 895.03(1) 1st Use or invest proceeds derived from pattern of racketeering activity. 2385 895.03(2) 1st Acquire or maintain through racketeering activity any interest in or control of any enterprise or real property. 2386 895.03(3) 1st Conduct or participate in any enterprise through pattern of racketeering activity. 2387 896.101(5)(b) 2nd Money laundering, financial transactions totaling or exceeding $20,000, but less than $100,000. 2388 896.104(4)(a)2. 2nd Structuring transactions to evade reporting or registration requirements, financial transactions totaling or exceeding $20,000 but less than $100,000. 2389 2390 Section 36.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and paragraph 2391 (a) of subsection (2) of section 772.102, Florida Statutes, are 2392 amended to read: 2393 772.102âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 2394 (1)ââCriminal activityâ means to commit, to attempt to 2395 commit, to conspire to commit, or to solicit, coerce, or 2396 intimidate another person to commit: 2397 (a)âAny crime that is chargeable by indictment or 2398 information under the following provisions: 2399 1.âSection 210.18, relating to evasion of payment of 2400 cigarette taxes. 2401 2.âSection 414.39, relating to public assistance fraud. 2402 3.âSection 440.105 or s. 440.106, relating to workersâ 2403 compensation. 2404 4.âPart IV of chapter 501, relating to telemarketing. 2405 5.âChapter 517, relating to securities transactions. 2406 6.âSection 550.235 or s. 550.3551, relating to dogracing 2407 and horseracing. 2408 7.âChapter 550, relating to jai alai frontons. 2409 8.âChapter 552, relating to the manufacture, distribution, 2410 and use of explosives. 2411 9.âChapter 562, relating to beverage law enforcement. 2412 10.âSection 624.401, relating to transacting insurance 2413 without a certificate of authority, s. 624.437(4)(c)1., relating 2414 to operating an unauthorized multiple-employer welfare 2415 arrangement, or s. 626.902(1)(b), relating to representing or 2416 aiding an unauthorized insurer. 2417 11.âChapter 687, relating to interest and usurious 2418 practices. 2419 12.âSection 721.08, s. 721.09, or s. 721.13, relating to 2420 real estate timeshare plans. 2421 13.âChapter 782, relating to homicide. 2422 14.âChapter 784, relating to assault and battery. 2423 15.âChapter 787, relating to kidnapping or human 2424 trafficking. 2425 16.âChapter 790, relating to weapons and firearms. 2426 17.âFormer s. 796.03, s. 796.04, s. 796.05, or s. 796.07, 2427 relating to prostitution. 2428 18.âChapter 806, relating to arson. 2429 19.âSection 810.02(2)(c), relating to specified burglary of 2430 a dwelling or structure. 2431 20.âChapter 812, relating to theft, robbery, and related 2432 crimes. 2433 21.âChapter 815, relating to computer-related crimes. 2434 22.âChapter 817, relating to fraudulent practices, false 2435 pretenses, fraud generally, and credit card crimes. 2436 23.âSection 827.071, relating to commercial sexual 2437 exploitation of children. 2438 24.âChapter 831, relating to forgery and counterfeiting. 2439 25.âChapter 832, relating to issuance of worthless checks 2440 and drafts. 2441 26.âSection 836.05, relating to extortion. 2442 27.âChapter 837, relating to perjury. 2443 28.âChapter 838, relating to bribery and misuse of public 2444 office. 2445 29.âChapter 843, relating to obstruction of justice. 2446 30.âSection 847.011, s. 847.012, s. 847.013, s. 847.06, or 2447 s. 847.07, relating to obscene literature and profanity. 2448 31.âSection 849.09, s. 849.14, s. 849.15, s. 849.23, or s. 2449 849.25, relating to gambling. 2450 32.âChapter 893, relating to drug abuse prevention and 2451 control. 2452 33.âSection 914.22 or s. 914.23, relating to witnesses, 2453 victims, or informants. 2454 34.âSection 918.12, s. 918.125, or s. 918.13, relating to 2455 tampering with or harassing court officials, retaliating against 2456 court officials, and tampering with evidence. 2457 (2)ââUnlawful debtâ means any money or other thing of value 2458 constituting principal or interest of a debt that is legally 2459 unenforceable in this state in whole or in part because the debt 2460 was incurred or contracted: 2461 (a)âIn violation of any one of the following provisions of 2462 law: 2463 1.âSection 550.235 or s. 550.3551, relating to dogracing 2464 and horseracing. 2465 2.âChapter 550, relating to jai alai frontons. 2466 3.âSection 687.071, relating to criminal usury and loan 2467 sharking. 2468 4.âSection 849.09, s. 849.14, s. 849.15, s. 849.23, or s. 2469 849.25, relating to gambling. 2470 Section 37.âSection 849.17, Florida Statutes, is amended to 2471 read: 2472 849.17âConfiscation of machines by arresting officer.âUpon 2473 the arrest of any person charged with the violation of ss. 2474 849.15-849.22, any of the provisions of ss. 849.15-849.23 the 2475 arresting officer shall take into his or her custody any such 2476 machine, apparatus or device, and its contents, and the 2477 arresting agency, at the place of seizure, shall make a complete 2478 and correct list and inventory of all such things so taken into 2479 his or her custody, and deliver to the person from whom such 2480 article or articles may have been seized, a true copy of the 2481 list of all such articles. The arresting agency shall retain all 2482 evidence seized and shall have the same forthcoming at any 2483 investigation, prosecution, or other proceedings, incident to 2484 charges of violation of ss. 849.15-849.22 any of the provisions 2485 of ss. 849.15-849.23. 2486 Section 38.âSection 849.18, Florida Statutes, is amended to 2487 read: 2488 849.18âDisposition of machines upon conviction.âUpon 2489 conviction of the person arrested for the violation of ss. 2490 849.15-849.22 any of the provisions of ss. 849.15-849.23, the 2491 judge of the court trying the case, after such notice to the 2492 person convicted, and any other person whom the judge may be of 2493 the opinion is entitled to such notice, and as the judge may 2494 deem reasonable, shall issue to the sheriff of the county a 2495 written order adjudging and declaring any such machine, 2496 apparatus or device forfeited, and directing such sheriff to 2497 destroy the same, with the exception of the money. The order of 2498 the court must shall state the time and place and the manner in 2499 which such property must shall be destroyed, and the sheriff 2500 shall destroy the same in the presence of the clerk of the 2501 circuit court of such county. 2502 Section 39.âSection 849.20, Florida Statutes, is amended to 2503 read: 2504 849.20âMachines and devices declared nuisance; place of 2505 operation subject to lien for fine.âAny room, house, building, 2506 boat, vehicle, structure, or place wherein any machine or 2507 device, or any part thereof, the possession, operation, or use 2508 of which is prohibited by ss. 849.15-849.22 ss. 849.15-849.23, 2509 must shall be maintained or operated, and each of such machines 2510 or devices, is declared to be a common nuisance. If a person has 2511 knowledge, or reason to believe, that his or her room, house, 2512 building, boat, vehicle, structure, or place is occupied or used 2513 in violation of ss. 849.15-849.22 the provisions of ss. 849.15 2514 849.23 and by acquiescence or consent suffers the same to be 2515 used, such room, house, building, boat, vehicle, structure, or 2516 place is shall be subject to a lien for and may be sold to pay 2517 all fines or costs assessed against the person guilty of such 2518 nuisance, for such violation, and the several state attorneys 2519 shall enforce such lien in the courts of this state having 2520 jurisdiction. 2521 Section 40.âSection 849.21, Florida Statutes, is amended to 2522 read: 2523 849.21âInjunction to restrain violation.âAn action to 2524 enjoin any nuisance as herein defined may be brought by any 2525 person in the courts of equity in this state. If it is made to 2526 appear by affidavit or otherwise, to the satisfaction of the 2527 court, or judge in vacation, that such nuisance exists, a 2528 temporary writ of injunction shall forthwith issue restraining 2529 the defendant from conducting or permitting the continuance of 2530 such nuisance until the conclusion of the action. Upon 2531 application of the complainant in such a proceeding, the court 2532 or judge may also enter an order restraining the defendant and 2533 all other persons from removing, or in any way interfering with 2534 the machines or devices or other things used in connection with 2535 the violation of ss. 849.15-849.22 ss. 849.15-849.23 2536 constituting such a nuisance. A No bond is not shall be required 2537 in instituting such proceedings. 2538 Section 41.âSection 849.22, Florida Statutes, is amended to 2539 read: 2540 849.22âFees of clerk of circuit court and sheriff.âThe 2541 clerks of the courts and the sheriffs performing duties under 2542 ss. 849.15-849.22 the provisions of ss. 849.15-849.23 shall 2543 receive the same fees as prescribed by general law for the 2544 performance of similar duties, and such fees must shall be paid 2545 out of the fine and forfeiture fund of the county as costs are 2546 paid upon conviction of an insolvent person. 2547 Section 42.âParagraph (a) of subsection (12) of section 2548 895.02, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2549 895.02âDefinitions.âAs used in ss. 895.01-895.08, the term: 2550 (12)ââUnlawful debtâ means any money or other thing of 2551 value constituting principal or interest of a debt that is 2552 legally unenforceable in this state in whole or in part because 2553 the debt was incurred or contracted: 2554 (a)âIn violation of any one of the following provisions of 2555 law: 2556 1.âSection 550.235 or s. 550.3551, relating to dogracing 2557 and horseracing. 2558 2.âChapter 550, relating to jai alai frontons. 2559 3.âSection 551.109, relating to slot machine gaming. 2560 4.âChapter 687, relating to interest and usury. 2561 5.âSection 849.09, s. 849.14, s. 849.15, s. 849.23, or s. 2562 849.25, relating to gambling. 2563 Section 43.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.